Tevye spent the next while, running up and down the ramp, pretending to skateboard.
Cover and refrigerate pie crust at least one hour before using.
To keep it together
I can’t tell you how much appreciate this extreme honor.
Fresh herbs in the spring and summer will lift up your meals and give them a boost, not only in flavour but nutritionally as well. I always try to put parsley into my green juices, salads or chopped on whole grains. Fresh herbs like dill are a wonderful accent to dips and soups. And use basil to make pesto – nothing beats the taste of it homemade!
To remember that day, a day of death and loss, is too painful.
I called my dad the next day for the first time in months, told him I was alive, but scared and didn’t know what to do. He advised me to put everything I owned in garbage bags and come home that day.
That event could be the death of Mandela. An event which must almost certainly occur this decade. When that happens South Africa's whites will face a great danger, and they must be prepared.
Mercedes (Mercy) Thompson is a Native American mechanic with her own auto repair shop in the Tri-Cities of Washington State. A pretty damn good mechanic, Mercy also has a secret...she is a walker, a shapeshifter who can take the form of a coyote. In this world, many of the lesser fae have revealed themselves to the wider public, although werewolves and shapeshifters still keep themselves hidden. Mercy lives next door to the Alpha of the Tri-Cities werewolf pack, Adam, and is fast friends with his daughter, Jesse. Another friend is a local vampire, who manages to blend into the community but drives around in a replica of the Scooby Doo Mystery Machine!
So there's my 'L' - the LONDON MARATHON
Looking back, it was a foreshadowing of what I do today. But I’m getting ahead of myself!
No biking today. Snow turning into more snow turning into single digit weather tomorrow morning. Maybe I'll bike Thursday or Friday.
It is said that Brigid was born at Faughart near Dundalk, Louth, Ireland, to Dubhthach, an Irish chieftain of Lienster, and Brocca, a slave at his court.
Here are my latest pics...
PS: If you have any questions for Kevin Hearne, Atticus, or Oberon post them in the comments! Kevin has agreed to answer your pressing questions: aka where do we get an Oberon? Anytime you think of one leave it during the read-a-long - we will gather them up and send them along to Kevin!
1cup Zucchinis (cubed)
Or perhaps looks at you and does not see you at all…
Here's the Recipe....
que rápido se nos alienta el corazón,
18. Ti Amo...Alfredo (02:17)
Yep, it's the cover page of the official outline document, and we're still making revisions to it. That's where we are at present. I guess it shows what a drawn-out process the movie development phase can be, but I promise everyone it's not because we're draggng our heels. Nailing the storyline is vitally important if you want a quick, clean script-writing experience. There is nothing worse than actually going into the dialogue when you still aren't sure where the story is leading - trust me, I've done it (those damn characters start talking for themselves - imagine that; it's bad enough when actors have opinions).
“Well. Your skin is dark. That’s why I assumed you were a Desert Dweller at least.”
Its pretty simple but if you are confused and believe me alot of these contest requirements
Everyone should call their local FBI office and get a copy of Law Enforcement Officers Killed and Assaulted. When it first came out it was ground breaking because it demonstrated to academics and other elites what street police knew all along. What did it show in interviews with cop killers? Nice guys finish dead. That's right. Most of those offenders commented that the Officer they killed set himself up to be killed because of reluctance to use force early in the encounter.
Years ago, Tun Abdul Razak once advised: “Don’t listen to rumours.” Not much has changed since then. Many people are still gullible, easily swayed, and outright ignorant.
I know Robin is ready to be done with the remodel, mostly because the longer it drags out, the more that gets added to the to-do list. We've also decided to have the painters go ahead and paint the Master Bathroom while they are here because parts of it are too hard for me to reach. Because of that, we also had to go ahead and get new bathroom lights for our bathroom. Nothing terribly exciting, just some nicely priced lights from Lowe's that coordinate with our faucets and other fixtures:
Would you brag about beating your 10-year-old at Scrabble? About making more money than your 14-year-old?
Right now I’m tossing around a decision about college. I finished my last class at CMCC for an associate degree in general studies, but how is that really going to help me in the long run? Should I continue next semester for my associates in business admin & supervision? Do I transfer to a bachelor degree at another school? Do I go to USM or UMA? It took me over 10 years to get my degree because I work full time while I went to school and did kid stuff. Do I continue to work & go to school for another however many years it’ll take to get a bachelor degree? Or do I cut my hours back and go to school full time? Do I stay in Maine to do this or do I move? Do I want to work for the State forever like a shit ton of other people I know? By the time I can retire there won’t be a retirement fund for me. When I think about staying in state service for the next 32 years I get anxious and depressed. I’ve already been here for 10 years (11 this year). Maybe if I get some of my student loans paid down I will go back to school.
Tinkerbell & Friends - Tinkerbell is cut at 5 1/2". Pretty tricky to do at this size.
Then the milonga workshop. Different kinds of traspie: a kind of simple basic rock-step, useful for slow intros, then the 'real' traspie, then a simplified version of it, more like a feint, which serves as traspie when dancing fast milonga. Recognising different parts of the milonga: tendency in milonga to use major and minor keys ('happy' and 'sad') alternately in sections. There are sections of a milonga with the traspie beat/rhythm, and there are sections without it when we dance lisse. Occasionally there are sections where we hear the traspie beat, but the melody is so smooth that we would naturally dance lisse. We walk through a milonga several times to get familiar with the sections in the music and rhythms, then dance it in open embrace with a partner, then again, swapping roles. We study and practice three milongas in this way. The method is practical and well-organised.
“Actually I do.”
I shouldn't complain: after hours spent behind the wheel, staring down an endless ribbon of asphalt while surrounded by the crumpled remains of Goldfish cracker bags and other travel detritus, any hot meal eaten at a standstill and a chance to rest in a horizontal position seem like luxuries. That is, until dawn's early light exposes their inadequacies and magnifies a sudden longing for the comforts of a home that's nearly 2000 miles away. Thank goodness, then, for a home away from home!
They have swept away your shadow from the streets
I’ve already covered why I think this is wrong from the perspective of a “featured” author, but indeed, what about visitors and followers? It was my material that brought them here, after all. They saw something in The Bard of Steel that they felt –bless their hearts– was worth coming back to. And now, it’s possible that by featuring the work of other people here I’m copping out in their eyes, blatantly brown-nosing and mooching for attention. Looking at things objectively, they would have a valid reason to think that. They want to see me write and I’m coming short on my promise to do that.
Never really into sports, not overly graceful (understatement of the year), and more likely to be found reading a book than working out.
This site "IS NOT" a propaganda site for Nick Griffin. This site is for the benefit of the British National Party and all her members. Its also here for race and nation. When the Chairman of the British National Party does well he will get rewarded with good write ups here, likewise when things are not going so well as things are now, then likewise we would like the problems addressed as we are writing about here.
Bowman Chrome Draft Future's Game Prospects #BDPP109
When you get older you may begin to feel like your memory is losing some of its ability to store as much information as it used to. Although this is normal – there are steps – techniques – and even exercises you can do to reduce this effect and may actually improve your memory.
Rough drafts of your research papers are due for peer editing next Friday, May 13.
In 2009, a movie like no other was made. This movie is The Uninvited.
I pulled into the grass across from the young ones, and stuck my Canon 7D with the 500mm lens and 1.4 tele-converter, out the window of the car. I was lucky to be so close to get these pictures. Exposure was 1/1000 sec. @f10, -0.3EV, ISO 250.
Living in a trailer, with fake paneling, plastic cupboards, shag carpeting, vinyl flooring, aluminum siding and metal slider windows held absolutely no appeal to me.
- This article from publishing and entertainment attorney Lloyd J.
Attendees will receive tips on how to create or strengthen local block and tenant associations, as well as learn about the available grant programs and workshops. Tips will be given on personal safety, property safeguarding, self-defense and late night home escort options. Attendees will also have an opportunity to address street lighting concerns.
The project will go up on a 30,140-square-foot section of Municipal Lot 1 directly north of the church. The lot will be sold to the church at what city officials called a “nominal price,” while community leaders said that lot is being given to the church.
There is more of importance in this small work than in just about any contemporary work on philosophy or theology. Ransom finds himself on a type of virginal Venus. Dr. Weston is possessed by demonic forces and is attempting to destroy an Eve-like character and the wonderful world she inhabits.
I wanted to make a real quick card today to send to my friend. Every summer she does something really fun, like going to Las Vegas and just staying in a hotel for a week. She usually takes her laptop and just sits by the pool and play all day. Then, she will go to the casinos at night and play most of the night! LOL
What a lovely surprise to come home to tonight, a flickr email from Jenna of Honey Bijou telling me she has chosen me as one of her "Hive Five" for the month of April.
These are just a few ideas. What else can copy editors do to save journalism?
So I needed to save up some money to get the time - and take a break from exhibiting and doing different art projects. After finishing my commission in August last year that's been what I'm doing: having the time for playing around and no pressure (but from myself). You could say I gave myself a working grant. Now I've soon run out of the saved money, but luckily I have some few incomes from teaching art occasionally so I'll do my best to stretch this period until winter. I've so far succeeded in holding back on getting involved in art projects in order to concentrate on just my "own" art (here I make a distinction between my own art and commissions for example). Luckily I haven't either gotten any more public commission (yes, I think it is good. A commission would have been a big distraction).
Out our backdoor we had a private patio with table and chairs where we could watch the sunrise and sunset. Our bathroom had a steam shower and a Jacuzzi. It was relaxing and perfect. Just the break we needed.
I guy I know has the first name of UB. I asked him if his first name was Ulysses. He said no and that UB stood for Unknown Boy. He told me the story about his great-grandfather who was a slave in the south and it was fairly common at that time that black boys and girls who were split from their families and sold to another slave owner didn't come with their birth names and the owners simply wrote their names down as UB or UG. His great-grandfather's name was passed down to the UB I know.
In his sufferings Paul is ‘filling up what is lacking in Christ's afflictions for . . . the church.’ Not that Paul's sufferings atone for sin or propitiate wrath or vindicate divine justice in passing over sins, but they show the unreached peoples of the world the sufferings of Christ. When Paul shares Christ's sufferings with joy and love, he delivers, as it were, those very sufferings to the ones for whom Christ died. Paul's missionary suffering is God's design to complete the sufferings of Christ, by making them more visible and personal and precious to those for whom he died.
picking my salad from my garden
Juniors:
Of course, being book 2 of 3, Insurgent ends on a cliffhanger that had me literally screaming at it (ask Boyo, the husbandical one) and I CANNOT BELIEVE I now have to wait AN ENTIRE YEAR for the conclusion. Urgh. Want.
Millar, Mark and Steve McNiven. Civil War. 2005. Marvel Comics.
A little planning can work wonders, it’s all just about planning and crossing your fingers for the weather to play ball. It won’t work out every night but for that odd one it does you’ll be well pleased you put in the effort.
Several weeks ago I shared a pencil drawing of an animal from a b/w photo, which happened to be of our donkey, Doris, for a class assignment in Misty Mawn's workshop. Another part of that class was to use the same drawing to personify the animal.
Check out this National Archives web site to learn how to use the 1940 Census, which can be tricky because you can't search by name. You need to search by location, and thus must have a general idea of where the person lived that you are looking for. But it is an amazing resource for all you budding genealogists. Happy hunting!
4/18/2012
By Ella Davies
You may choose five accessories (these include bag/purse, jewellery, scarves etc)
"I don't mind Spunk....you can leave. I am giving you a free pass. It is dark here....in the world of infertility and I want out".
Each person who joins our forum from this bloghop will go in the draw for a craft pack.So join in on the fun and maybe find a new forum, new blog and new friends along the way. You never know you may even learn something new or win a great prize.
He said work was happening to either identify a new building to house the Marmite factory in, or to carry out work on the tower as quickly as possible so staff could move back in, but another jar of Marmite was not expected to be made there until July."
It started with a package gone astray. Officials at the Warsaw Customs House were holding a box that according to its declaration was radio equipment. But before it could go through customs, a representative of the German shipper appeared, said a mistake had been made and demanded that it be returned to Germany.
OK – so here’s the deal: RUPERT STROUD is, as I have already alluded, a ‘singer / songwriter,’ and ‘Chasing The Night’ is his second album. Hired hands were called upon to fill out the sound and the result is that of a full band, rather than what I expected – some bloke sitting on a high stool with an acoustic guitar balanced on his knee and singing pained expressions of lost love and ill luck. (Nothing like a good, old fashioned stereotypical assumption, eh?!)
Snog - kissing +++
And now here we are.
The Godfather reminds us of the importance of being tough when necessary. “As soon as Vito Corleone allowed a few moments of weakness to be seen by his enemy, they attempted to assassinate him. And it was largely because of failures of his team,” Moore observes.
Enjoy your Saturday, my friends.
So, there you have it. My top tips for submitting. And remember: the most important thing is making sure the story comes first. A brilliant story will almost always find a good home – so making it brilliant is the most important step. If you do that, everything else should fall into place.
Here's to the next 4 years ;P
It's Mother's Day. I think it's my 5th Mother's Day. If you're a mother that works outside the home all week than I'm sure the best thing you can think to do on Mother's Day is spend time with your kids. I get it. You don't see them as much as you would like during the week. It makes sense. I'm in the other boat on this one. I spend all week engaging my children on a mad hunt for new things to do. I seem to always fail because my kids like to do the same things over and over. I honestly think I could draw you a friggen blueprint of the B&O Railroad Museum because we have been there so much. The boy likes trains, so we go whenever we can and seriously, it is drudgery for me. I feel like a zombie when I'm there but they both love it. If it were up to Owen, we would go there daily.
Having been rejected for two vice-chair positions I now enter the second half of my council term yet to climb onto the first rung of the council structure.
Brings a whole new meaning to getting the you-know-what scared out of you.
And the book says that we should make a conscious effort to always live in our Zone of Genius and find ways to escape our Zone of Competence and even our Zone of Excellence as much as possible.
Time yesterday 3.5 hours. Today ??
I don’t have very many of my old film images digitized, but this one just brings back such wonderful memories, and I still do like this image.
5. Airline ground agent
If you don't have the Unity Stamp of the Week why on earth NOT? You totally need it. Yes, it's a stamp a week...delivered right to your door...sometimes it's even a couple of stamps! Ummmm so much Unity goodness I just don't know how you can say no...well yes, I do know the many, many reasons you can say no...but spoil yourself! It's sooo worth it.
You make me and your Dad so darn happy!
‘you fuckers!’ i screamed, feeling my vocal chords rip like paper, and i couldn’t give a shit. oddly enough, i remember feeling bad that i was cursing at them. they had been nice. they liked me. i liked them. they were trying to help.
I have a great Margarita recipe for two:
Most days I think I would rather work with animals instead of people.
Coming into the bottom of the fifth, Kyle Convissar stepped up to bat in place of Alfredo Rodriguez who left the game after pulling his hamstring while attempting to steal second.
Wind Song - 4.4M
You decide.
Enjoying Texas Sized margaritas at Rita's on the Riverwalk. Driver, Sam, ordered his Jersey Sized. That's my high school friend in red and her daughter who were in town for a wedding. Tempting picture of the margarita taken by Middle Age Mom, here.
Not Italy. CHINA.
But, you know something, if society is going to treat me like I’m getting in the way, then that’s exactly what I’ll do. I’ll start acting my age. And you know what that means, don’t you? That’s right. I’m going to really get in your way.
So now Jubilee has been released into the world, what plans are afoot for events? Are these going to tie in with the Diamond Jubilee?
I got John to come and get rid of our friend and he flushed it down the toilet. When we told the story to our friends they mentioned that they ususally travel in pairs and while they are not deadly the bite can be painful. I have a feeling that the scorpion was just afraid as we were.
coconut oil - 3 tbsp
We have the privilege of repeating this process many times in life. I say privilege because each step comes with a new blessing. Sometimes it feels like we are going in circles, but we are acually going in spirals, going deeper each time. Sometimes we feel like we spend an inordinate amount of time on one step, but he is faithful and doesn’t give up on us. He understands our pain and sends the Holy Spirit to come along side on the journey.
Today's card i've featured Krista Smith's gorjuss 'booby love' digi which i snagged from her blog as a freebie last month not sure if it's still there! but wow i love her, she reminds me so much of me and resembles something i'm passionate about 'fundraising' and the pink ribbon is symbolic to me as i lost my nan to cancer christmas day 2004, so she kinda brought all these memories back but in a good way and i have to say after creating today's card there's no way i could part with it! i ♥'s it too much haha!
I love piling gallon jars of strawberry jelly, 50-pack rolls of Charmin, a year's supply of Bic Disposable Razors and boxes of Tide large enough to wash everyone's clothes for 10 years in there.
Listing price: $49.5 million
Online Stores: Etsy
Last night, though, it was insanely windy.
Toshiba AT200
Are no longer with us, sir.
A late steak dinner and the pie from the cafe finished off what was pretty close to a perfect day.
- psychokinesis — mind’s ability to move objects without physical touch.
And keep going. When you least expect it, you’ll open a letter, an email, and be pleasantly surprised.
We read the book “ That’s Life” which was about how earth began and all the life forms on earth. We really enjoyed learning about the different species on earth and the food webs in nature. We liked looking at the photographs and diagrams. Our favourite part was learning about how animals use colour in different ways. We didn’t really understand some parts of the book, like the part about different bacteria and cells because we hadn’t heard of them before. We would read this book again because it was interesting and colourful. Overall, we thought this book was brilliant!
In the vast majority of the world’s languages, the word for “mother” begins with the letter “M.”
Μου ήρθε αυτό το ραπόρτο με διάφορα παλαβά.... και ψάρωσα άσχημα:)))))
– That’s better. Now, whom did they get?
This one represents the charming Mr Jack Coleman, formerly of Leila's Café and now a coffee roaster extraordinaire in his own right, based down near Maltby Street in Bermondsey.
The essential character of this economy is such that it has not been free from the market dictatorship of the advanced countries of the world – countries like the USA, UK, Germany and China. These countries may be having their own headaches in the contemporary context but the level of their pampered self-satisfaction and essential growth can still not be equated with what we have in Africa, where the economy is assailed by an avalance of troubles created from within and outside the continent.
1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour (spooned and leveled)
Spaces and objects trigger unique memories and associated feelings
Because, as I discovered early on in life, if a book had a strong female character, I would look up to her and pretend to be her.
smell blue
"Two hours later, the train slid into Gare du Nord."
Gentlemen finding their own Broady can be accommodated.
Before you even consider a hormone replacement regiment, you should consider all of the facts. First off, the results of hormone replacement have not exact measurement, because every person is different. The amazing growth you see in one individual may not even closely resemble what you might achieve. Likewise, the incognito appearance of another might fool you into thinking that you could get away with growing tiny breasts, and you end up a C cup. You should have no expectations about what kind of results you may see in yourself.
Happy cooking and happy Blogging!
*Scholastic responds to vociferous "Wha?"
C) Candid
The book chronicles the plight, hopefulness and jubilation of the Auburn family from 2008 to 2010 in light of several genres of Psalms. From the 2008 and 2009 decline and rebuilding of our program and coinciding rise of our most hated rival to the journey to the mountaintop of the BCS National Championship in 2010, Nomel relates the feelings of Auburn fans in these seasons to emotions played out in the Psalms. Ask any Auburn fan about the ’08 and ’09 seasons and some form of “How long, oh Lord?” will most likely be heard. From the spectacular implosion and slow, exciting rebuilding we witnessed with our own program to the meteoric rise of the Alabama program, most Auburn fans, while still retaining the pride always felt by members of the Auburn family, felt the cruel tinge of despair and agony as those seasons unfolded. We could truly relate to the Psalmists as our enemies gloated and we suffered.
The Bible makes the following very specific comments about the way to salvation, the abundant life, and everlasting life through Jesus Christ (and see John 3:1-8, 14-17; 10:9-10; 14:5-6):
4)That auditing and accounting functions are carried out by a scrutiny committee of 2 independent party members as well as independent professionals who have had to tender for the contract in order to secure the most competitive rate for Party
1 ranging
Yet, I feel in the pit of my stomach that this situation could lead to a teacher conference. I'm pretty sure you do not read these aloud, so I think the only one who will be embarrassed is your teacher, when she has to explain to me as a first-time parent where the boundaries are for drawing letter words.
I unwittingly fell into a poetry class on the MA in Creative Writing, chosen by mistake as I’d read the course criteria incorrectly (pick two of the following: poetry, prose, playwriting – I read that as ‘pick two subjects’ – when in fact it was pick two classes under the same topic umbrella to specialise in). As a result I did poetry and fiction, learning little from either, but finishing both to the worst of slipshod. Even now it’s hard to fathom what those two maniacal hours of attic neurosis actually entailed. The sheer torture of hauling my billowed boobs and cement hip up five flights of stairs, reading aloud the tutor’s Christmas cards for no apparent reason and being compelled to listen to jingling bells on a random lunatic’s skirt. Even the honeycomb brittle egos of the ‘serious’ poets falling apart when criticised didn’t get to me as much as the complete lack of instruction or learning did. That somehow being so near the curtain in Oz with this ‘revered’ poet who’d made it to a level we’d never lick, was enough of a résumé-adventure in itself. What did it matter if every single poem any of us wrote was construed and metaphrased as just another fold in a big menstrual minge? Even when a [male] classmate wrote a poem about views of Belfast a la whizzing bicycle, the tutor still managed to turn it into a sheela-na-gig blood cake. No difference at all between Dorothy, Scarecrow, Toto or whoever else was sitting on the other side of this soiled drapery. Most of us left none the wiser and twice as disoriented. I raved as if brain-burgled, after every single class. In the end I wrote my ‘project’ in one night and bastardised everything in sight from TV ads to antiquated indexes in out-of-print bird watching books. Not that it made any difference to the marks: in bought MAs nearly everyone ends up in the same passable, plastic category. It’s almost poetic, come to think of it.
and I can love.
Company of Heroes 2 is due for release in 2013 and will in fact be focused on the Eastern Front, allowing players to play as the Russians against the invading Germans (no word on if players will be able to play as the Germans as well; I assume so). The first game was noted for its destructible terrain and the sequel will continue to evolve that, with soldiers now able to leap over obstacles and snow forming a barrier which can slow troops and tanks down but can also be used as cover. A more robust line of sight will be featured and the game will apparently seek to recreate the massive battles of the Eastern Front, hinting at a possible move to a larger scale than the original game's smaller-sized engagements (D-Day, the largest battle featured in the original game, was only the 23rd largest battle of WWII, most of the bigger ones were fought in Russia).
Let's take a walk down memory lane to see how my girls have reacted the past few years.
I snapped this quick photo with my phone in the big middle of flinging tea. Yes, the fabric covers my dining table. It took me all afternoon to get this thing dyed, it was so big. Then, I only gave it a quick ironing and laid it out over the sewing machine desk to finish drying. I usually iron my fabric completely dry but I'd had enough of wrestling fabric for the day! It got a good ironing after work today.
Several environmental agents have been linked with primary biliary cirrhosis (PBC) that include bacteria, xenobiotics and viruses.
This is a Buell, the engine has it roots in the Harley but the rest is sport bike. I think it's a lot like buying a spinning wheel or even a car. You need to feel comfortable and it needs to fit you. This fits me and it very comfortable with my body size. I know what you are thinking, they're so dangerous and if this was a BB gun it would be "you'll shoot your eye out".
And laugh past your tears
“No.”
Derek's Scarf
So if you’re having trouble “seeing” the God who sees you, try looking for him:
Now, Saba and her family head west to meet him and start a new life.
Sadly, in UNMIL, the Nigerian units
For me, I started with the people I trust and look to for compassion and guidance. I admitted I how I was feeling, and allowed myself to be talked through it with kind words, sympathy, and positive thoughts about the future.
Well, that was a no-brainer on my part, I had to have a taste. It was like the heavens opened up and a choir of angels began to sing. A very delicious hoppy, dry taste that I just love in an IPA. Granted, it's not the overpowering hops of a double IPA but it's also not the killer alcohol level either.
We tried using metallic thread but it just ended up white because the gold stripped off the thread as it was being sewn. I think I might need to get 'metallic' needles or something for using metallic thread. In the end, this gold coloured thread looked fine.
It wasn't apparent until I hit the main road. Then I heard a constant grinding sound and felt my car's obvious struggle on the road, I briefly wondered if we were about to be suddenly engulfed in a fireball. At the first side street I could find I pulled in and parked in front of an elderly care center...another car pulled in right after me and I reconsidered my stopping location. I didn't want to be seen by anybody in my bra-less state, wearing plaid pajama pants with Walmart clog shoes and a lopsided ponytail. But then I said "eff it" and got out to assess the vehicle. I had hoped for something simple, like ice stuck over the wheels. But as I made my way around to the other side of the car, the problem was quickly evident: a flat tire.
Chest high shooting, camera slightly above me, a bit of cloud cover
Of course, all of the other elements still applied, and became the focus of my ‘strategic goals’. They are, at present:
Except I had no stakes. All I had were these landscaping flags. I don't even know why we have these. I think maybe we had to flag the heads of our sprinkler system once? I don't know...
Trust me, I know how hard it can be to come up with that next great story idea. So for this writing Wednesday let’s discuss generating the creative writing ideas for your breakthrough novel.
Cliché?
Perez and co-organizer Susie Carrillo were nervous initially, having spent months planning the event. But once the drumbeats and dancing began and their cadence absorbed the atmosphere, the organizers were at once relieved and pleased with the tenor of things.
Galileo
Between love and loss, there is obligation…
We are eating Swiss chard from our garden - last year's plants which we are cutting regularly to stop them going to seed, which they undoubtedly will now given half a chance. It was so good to eat the chard this lunch time, cut straight from the garden and just wilted in a saucepan. All the vegetables in the greengrocers are so sad and getting 'past it' now aren't they? Roll on the fresh peas and broad beans and those little tender sweetheart cabbages!
1. the combination of blood and saliva that flies or leaks from the mouth whilst being pummeled: After he provoked those bikers, they extracted at least a pint of beat juice.
So, what do I believe then? I wholeheartedly believe there is always more than one way of doing something in life, and recipes are no different. Take this as an example: pancakes, the blueberry kind, with the same kind of flour, liquid, number of eggs, and spices. The difference was in how the blueberries were used.
I get told off a lot for not being more visible on my own blog,
She shares her birthday with grandson Porter, and he is having a high flying birthday today, so here is his card celebrating his third birthday!
I can't believe I forgot to eat gummy bears today while I was cutting 136 pieces of turquoise rectangles today. It didn't feel like I did anything today but then I counted. Now I feel pretty good. I am working on the runners for Sanctuary. This is my first real order for Sam Harvey. It is so much work but I am very proud to have it! Why did I make it so complex! I have to make 15 of them and one copy for myself. I want to get it done as soon as I can. Honestly, I can cut one color fabric out per day. There are about 10 different fabrics. Crazy that I haven't counted. I need a really long table to lay everything out but for now I am laying everything out on my ironing board. It is already full. I just afraid Skibu will decide to sit on them when I am not looking.
Next year, I’m signing up early, in order to have work reviewed. (I’ll also go a little lighter on the horseradish, at Acme and Felix’s).
However, it is not only the Bongos in Gabon who have used France as a safe haven for their ill gotten wealth and who are being protected by the French state. Paul Biya of Cameroon, Dos Santos of Angola, Denis Sassou Nguesso of Congo Republic, Blaise Campore of Burkina Faso and Obiang Nguema of Equatorial Guinea have made headlines in recent years for using France as a fortress for their corrupt dealings. For example Denis Sassou Nguesso, according to French police investigation has 24 properties, one hundred and twelve (112) bank accounts and fleet of cars in France. It is believed that these numerous bank accounts contain hundreds of millions of dollars of money siphoned from the coffers of his resource rich but economically impoverished country.
While almost every one of the Republican primary candidates support building a wall along the entire nearly 2,000 mile border between Mexico and the United States, at a cost of nearly $50 billion over 25 years, none of them seem to be bringing forth any real comprehensive immigration reform (short of calling them illegals and saying we should throw them out).
After consulting with a past English teacher, my sister, Lesley Hamilton, and a future English teacher, my daughter, Terra Rothpletz, we came up with a list of 100 words that are dispersed by educators but not necessarily understood by students. Rather than list the definitions here, I thought it might be better to just include the link so that you could test yourself. Look at the following words and see how well you do. To find out the definitions, just click on the word.
Life events both big and small, and important things like birthday cakes, ice creams, and lollies that feature mysteriously regularly - are documented in the way only kids can.
before his crucifixion. The quiet of this location provides a striking contrast
Ugh?! I'm growing! Just lemme eat in peace *fatty*
4. Pushes me to be a better woman
I don’t think any of us would be bothering to ask the BNP to do the same!
5. Renounce all self-justification: According to John the Dwarf, “We have put aside the easy burden, which is self-accusation, and weighed ourselves down with the heavy one, self-justification.”
Good bye, baby good bye,
The youngest daughter, Jia-Ning, is still in school. She works part-time at a Wendy’s, where she meets a co-worker’s discarded boyfriend. Jia-Ning offers sympathy. The young man responds. They discover they share many interests. But how can she, as a youngest daughter, leave her father?
Appearance (0-3): Pours up a crystal clear golden amber with red highlights and thick white head that takes a while to fall. 3 points
B: Thank you for taking the time to complete this interview Captin, and I wish you all the best with the release of your second series!
--varnish
Jack did wonderfully in Kindergarten this year. He is very smart, good at math and reading and made some wonderful friends. Honestly, if I could have hand picked his friends I would have picked the same ones he did. Great choices. He is quiet in class-I hope he gets a teacher this year who will draw him out a little more-but always follows instructions and is a good friend to others. Every time I was in his classroom helping I was proud to see how good he was in class.
runner since turbo-boy was so far ahead we couldn’t even see him. The guy in second was actually the husband of a woman my wife works with, who just randomly happened to be at the same race. This guy has done multiple Ironmans, marathons, a 50-mile Ultra, and just did his first 100-mile Ultra a couple months ago. Super nice, super down-to-Earth guy, but when I saw him at the start I figured he was going to eat everyone alive. On a hill around mile 2 I caught up to him and passed him, and still felt pretty good. The whole course was surprisingly hilly. For some reason I assumed it would be much flatter.
The Great Purge had about 700K get bullets in the back of head. The numbers are fuzzy on how many died during torture or in NKVD custody. Stalin, being an overachiever, also executed around 100,000 priests and nuns. One time he took a vacation into Mongolia to kill another 30K Mongolians. This is all before the biggest war in history where Stalin really got his murder on. He let 150,000 Poles die in captivity.
This was all brought to a head this episode thanks to the introduction of bent cop Grossmith played by Joel Tobek. In case his name didn’t give him away Grossmith is the obvious villain of the episode. He’s a cartoon character who surprisingly doesn’t cackle at the end of his every scene. He’s in charge of investigating the murder at the circus and it’s obviously that Jack doesn’t trust him. After getting over the initial shock of discovering there is in fact a third officer who works at this police station, we learn important information like that Grossmith likes to have a drink on the job. Grossmith shares a drink with Hugh, and Jack reprimands them both for it because he has a massive stick up his ass.
My papers are Prima's Meadow Lark and I've matted and stitched them onto pink, white and lilac cardstock. I coloured my image with copic markers and added some star dust stickles to her wings.
(Adapted from Nigella Lawson)
expecting an email from me, be patient.
But in the fantasy world of Internet gaming, they were masters of all they encountered, swashbuckling adventurers exploring mythical lands and slaying monsters. Every evening, the couple, Kim Yun-jeong and her husband, Kim Jae-beom, 41, left their one-room apartment for an all-night Internet cafe where they role-played, often until dawn. Each one raised a virtual daughter, who followed them everywhere, and was fed, dressed and cuddled — all with a few clicks of the mouse.
Can you recommend a site where publishing contract terms are, if not discussed, defined (and maybe have a note like "This is good, this is okay, this is bad")? I know I'd have an attorney explain any contract to me anyway, but it would be nice to have some working knowledge to begin with. Like many other things to do with publishing, there's no one definitive source for this kind of information--you have to pull it together from multiple locations. Below are some resources that I've picked up in my travels around the Internet.
Furthermore, just as a cloud has a beginning and an end, the material nature also has a beginning and an end, and our material body also has a beginning and an end. Our body simply exists for some time. It takes birth, grows, stays for some time, gives off some by-products, dwindles, and then vanishes. These are the six transformations of the body. Similarly, every material manifestation undergoes these six transformations. Thus at the end this whole material world will be vanquished.
Frankie blinked hard, several times, before replying. "What? All of them?"
Drummer and lyricist Neil Peart explained, “In late 2011, my drum teacher Freddie Gruber, towards the end of his long and adventurous 84 years, was reminiscing among friends and former students. Often he would shake his head and say, "I had quite a ride. I wish I could do it all again." That is not a feeling I have ever shared about the past -- I remain glad that I don't have to do it all again. While working on the lyrics for "Headlong Flight," the last song written for Clockwork Angels, I tried to summarize my character's life and adventures. My own ambivalence colored the verses, while Freddie's words inspired the chorus ‘I wish that I could live it all again.”
Here’s what it looked like for me to have just one of my “secrets” revealed to me.
Or maybe he says that because he feels like there won't BE any elections in Venezuela ever again?
Hair of the Dog did far better. The brewery's take on Earth Day is Blue Dot, so named for the wee speck of azure floating in Alpha Centauri's sky. But HotD pretty much exists in the realm of stylistic abstraction (contasted to German precision), unable to brew a beer to style if their lives depended on it, so this was perhaps not the most challenging task.
In a similar vein to the newly launched Celluloid International, we're still looking for that special essay that examines critically and seriously three great films in a row by a single director to launch Director's Triple Crown. We have columns on John Carpenter and David Cronenberg in the pipeline, but we want more! Do you have a favorite filmmaker who has struck gold three times in a row? Let's hear about them!
D - Leftover Pork and Cabbage
Iván Meade - I have to say that your “Aids Memorial Installation” in Vancouver I believe it is one of your most beautiful works. It was really interesting to see something modern, minimal and clean looking depicting a message of hope. How did you arrive at the design that became your end result?
Anwaar: Traitors do not love, father. Sadly, you’ve become one of them.
So I was busy nesting. I guess some people start nesting weeks before their baby comes. But I was last minuet and started nesting the day of. I was busy scrubbing and washing our stairs. Josh came home from lunch and I told him about everything.
Weekly?
Barefoot & Bliss 6x6 Paper Pad
Let's see...hung out with more than half of the campers, learned the names of almost all of them, ate vegetarian food, served other people the same, swam in the creek, walked around in my bra and pants, went to bonding night, the trust circle, prom, the graduation ceremony, the intention circle, meetings every morning and every night, workshops, and unisex late night parties in the girls bathroom, made new friends, learned new things (for instance: chocolate is made by separating cocoa butter from cocoa mass and mixing them back together in a certain way with a few other ingredients), hugged everyone I could, slept in Forest Dell, got a hug button, got an oh, James button, pushed people's buttons, and talked, and talked, and talked.
Now, I’ve never really cooked moussaka before, but after recently receiving the Gwinganna…From the Garden to Gourmet cookbook (which you MUST to get your hands on) it occurred to me that this needs to change. Immediately.
I will spare you all with me singing Happy Birthday to you only because I can't carry a tune to save my life. So, since I'm sparing your ears with a horrible screech why don't you instead share with us your Birthday Creations. It can be anything as long as it relates to a Birthday.
How will this affect my son? …. I remember how pissed I was when I found out I had a little brother and my dad didn’t tell our family till he was 15.
My love to you
This is going to sting a little to write. In March, I set a deadline to have a query letter sent out by the end of April. Unfortunately, some unforeseen circumstances have prevented that from happening. The critique I won in the Writer’s Platform Building Campaign allowed me to send my query for an assessment as well. I haven’t received all the feedback yet, so I’m hesitant to do anything until I receive a full critique. Based on what I’ve received so far, I believe it will be incredibly helpful and will give me a much stronger chance of landing an agent.
April 28 – Los Angeles, venue TBA
2. Heat a large skillet over medium-high heat. Add olive oil; swirl to coat. Add shrimp mixture, and saute for 4 minutes or until shrimp are done. Remove from pan; keep warm.
President Obama has managed to match President Bush’s “Mission accomplished” assertion with “The tide has turned” in his recent visit to Kabul, Afghanistan. Predicting the end of armed conflict in the Middle East is a fool’s game because the horizon keeps receding in a region that is more famed for warfare and revolution than anything else. World leaders have always tried to influence events and trends with rhetoric. It rarely works. Recall, Chamberlain’s return from the 1938 Munich conference that gave Czechoslovakia to Hitler, proclaiming he had achieved “Peace in our time.” Trying to make deals with despots is always a losing proposition and the Middle East is chockablock with despots. Obama’s claim that the killing of Osama bin Laden diminished al Qaeda’s power in the Middle East is one of those fantasies that will lead to more bloodshed. As Seth Jones, a Rand Corporation analyst noted in a recent Wall Street Journal opinion, “”With a number of regimes teetering from the Arab Spring, al Qaeda is pushing into the vacuum and riding a resurgent wave as its affiliates engage in a violent campaign of attacks across the Middle East and Africa.”....
I've been HERE! I'm testing up though, so maybe next week...
The old woman comes out, sits down hard, and adjusts her skirt. Her feet are cracked in places, funny neglected feet of two colors. They have walked ten thousand miles in this lifetime and will be ready to walk ten thousand more, when called upon. She takes the rag from her head and the sweat collected on her brow is wiped away.
But for the first twelve weeks, I was in complete misery. Overwhelmed by fear, and terribly sick. I can remember how difficult it was to find things to eat that would stay down, I can remember individual vomiting sessions. I remember at least two weeks in which I subsisted on Easy Mac, v8 fusion and smoothies. I can remember that it was dreadful. I can remember how much worse it got when constipation struck, and how incapacitated I was when the bleeding episodes hit. Further on, I can clearly remember the clutch of terror at the feeling of a clot sliding out of me in a gush of warm, red blood.
As for going back to bed in the morning, here’s the reason I quiet that critical, guilt-inducing inner voice and do it more often than not: I remember when Teddy, now a 210-lb. 15-year-old football player, was a roly poly five-year-old, still asleep in my bed when his big brother and sister left for school. I remember how often I forced myself to resist the pull to go back and join him so I could do something so important like dishes or laundry. I remind myself that ten years from now there will still be laundry and dishes and letters to write, but there will not be a cuddly child lying in my bed.
In this new religion we don't just have a new god, we also have a New Man. The New Man has shed the wickedness of his previously pagan existence and is now cleansed and enlightened by the shining light of the Internet.
It serves a great purpose to reiterate that the only beneficial method is the Direct Method. “Traditional foreign language classroom methodologies…may rely more heavily on learning about the L2 ‘without the pragmatic use of the language for interaction’…” (Pelletieri 287). This is the only way to gain some mastery of the target language before any meaningful interaction can occur with it, which will denounce the apprehension every student experiences when learning about a different culture.
-Christine S. Dayrit (Rendezvous, Philippine Star)
Whenever passing through, I find the place retains its distinctive sense of peace and tranquillity, which is all the more remarkable given how close it is to the hustle and bustle of Cours de l’Intendance, Place de la Comédie and the aforementioned Place des Grands Hommes.
They fail to mention: $101.3 Billion bailout money has been laundered thru AIG to pay special interest firms. We are failing to focus on the big picture: Politicians are creating precedent for government confiscations and expansion – all financed with our taxpayer money.
Although A HUNDRED LITTLE PATHS is my first novel, my writing experience includes a five year career in advertising. I have a B.A. in Psychology from UCLA, and I am currently the owner of a successful home-based internet company in (town). I'm also the mother of two little girls, and married to my high school sweetheart, a Certified Financial Planner.
I'm going to be a muddy maniac....although not at the same time. First off, the maniac part....
3. Whisked into a vinaigrette or ranch salad dressing
Meanwhile, SMRT continues to suffer from daily disruption in services and train delay due to a ‘rare confluence of factors’ such as ‘train fault’, ‘track fault, ‘heavy downpour’, ‘train congestion’ and ‘platform door fault’.
A couple of those older boys sure look like their uniforms might be gray.
I also had pretty shitty GRE scores. I totally abhor standardized tests. I don't know why but I find it really hard to do well in those kinda tests. I took the GRE twice with almost the same results. I was livid. I firmly believe that those scores do not justify me as a student and in refuse to pay hundreds to take yet another stupid GRE exam that I will probably bomb again (Am I the only who thinks that GRE is a get rich scheme?) Anyway, instead of taking yet another GRE exam, I worked around my GRE scores. I looked into schools that's not too rigid with GRE score requirements but instead weigh in on all the achievements you've got as an undergraduate.
Level 9: Ignores 36% of monster’s DEF.
On the U.S.D.A website, there is a page with an “International Overview” stating “All of agriculture has become global. For example, the success of the U.S. farm sector is increasingly dependent on our ability to trade and compete with other nations. Similarly, the science of agriculture depends on international research partnerships to address national issues of food safety, sustainability, resource management, biotechnology, and crop and livestock disease prevention.
“Stay outta this you cunt. You want some? Eh.....eh? Who the fuck do you think you are mate….eh?”
Me neither.
“There is no evidence that Romney can unseat President Obama in November. A recent NBC/Wall Street Journal poll has Obama beating Romney handily in a one-to-one contest, with Obama drawing 50 percent support to Romney’s 44 percent.”
Best Man – Brent Daufeldt
Transfer to the fridge to cool and thicken slightly while the dough is proving.
Anyway we met when we were six living on a housing estate in NW London, it was summer I’m not sure of the exact month so the song above was number one in June of 1971
Hopes
(note to friends..it's only a matter of WHEN I have a nervous breakdown..not if)
Remember to stop by the #watchwed hashtag in Twitter to discuss any of today’s reviews, or to mention any television programs that you’d like to see on Why It’s Worth a Watch Wednesday in the future.
Oh until I can figure out how to attach these files directly to the blog, you'll have to do it one at a time. If you need more help just send me an email....via my profile.
Fair to say that no other English manager had this kind of access to another country’s players. You only need to look at the number of foreign stars in the league at the time. Now it’s clear that every side invests in pan-European scouting networks, spotting players at all stages of their development and in every arena.
There is not a Win-Win or an easy fix for this problem. Without a doubt, the repair costs for the current system will continue to rise. As these costs rise, additional cuts will have to be made (dollar for dollar) in other areas to offset these additional expenditures.
As you can imagine the space i was working with was small...very small, (and it all has to be cleared away in record time as we taxi before take-off)... but it just goes to prove that 'big is not always better'.
Their jazz counterparts enjoy similar rapture listening to those long long improvised free-form widdling saxophone pieces, which are, ‘oh so brilliant’ and of course, ‘oh so difficult’.
Then I remember one last thing, something the inspiring Ms. Jody Hedlund alluded to in a recent post at her blog. She talked about my unique writer’s journey and the pace I may be meant to keep. How I translate that to apply to me: I’m exactly where I’m supposed to be (in God’s plan for me, or so I choose to think). If that’s the case, then all I need to do is hang in a little longer, keep taking steps in positive directions and, like these days with hubby, enjoy peaking during a much-welcomed moment of payoff.
Just close your eyes and hear me calling
"We are disappointed that union opposition has once again made it difficult to do the right thing for children," she told the Brooklyn Eagle. More here.
I just don’t know how bands can tour anymore—gotta be so expensive, and to what actual financial or public relations gain? Matter of fact, even local bands must be going extinct. It’s always been a young person’s game, and always financially iffy, but right now? Sheesh, how long can one put off earning a living, just to bring the heavy riffage to a niteklub?
Henry flicks eyebrows, as if to say, hey.
understand perfectly the President's desire to see the law repealed and
Eventually I did read the proposal all the way through, of course, and I even re-read what I thought were some critical parts, but it was a slog from start to finish. I had to work really hard to figure out that the proposed work was of some interest and significance. The PI did not highlight the significance, but it was in there, somewhere.
He had dead chickens.
As a stylist I am constantly telling my clients that they don't need as many clothes as they think. Most women are under the assumption that if they were to "makeover" their style (with or without my help)...they must be ready to invest in an extensive wardrobe re-vamp (think: massive purchase) and they just don't have the funds to do so. This is simply NOT true.
Saturday, April 13, 2012, could pass for a very bad day for Mr. Nwakama, his wife and others on a South East-bound bus. That day, dare devil armed robbers, attacked them, near Okada town, in Edo State. Nwakama (other names withheld), a Lagos-based businessman, was one of the victims of the robbery attack. Narrating his bad experience, he revealed that he and his wife had boarded at Berger, at the boundary between Lagos and Ogun states, on their way to attend the burial of his wife’s uncle in Delta State. He said he intended to travel in the night but his wife suggested they should rather take a day bus for security reason.
Vidocq chanced upon him at prayer in a church,
After making all of this stuff in 1 day, I worked up quite the appetite. Luckily my neighborhood back home in Philly is home to a wonderful bakery called Bredenbeck's, which has been around since 1889! I picked up a box of petit fours, brewed a pot of mint melange, and threw on my "Tea Party jams". It was a good day.
Why not visit the Open Eye Gallery on Abercromby place. Exhibitions from Claire Harrigan, Hazel Nagl, Michael Lythgoe, Alice McMurrough, Ann Ross, and Karen McPhail will be taking place in November. Art work to admire and buy.
each in its cauld hand held a light,-
For more details about the "'Have Yourself a Foodie Christmas' Holiday Recipe Contest" and to submit recipes visit www.eatnlisten.com.
Conclusion – Canada loves hockey AND Cheddar cheese.
Purifying Silken Cleanser: Removes makeup and impurities without over drying, while conditioning agents restore and maintain skin's natural moisture balance. I liked the way this smelled and how nicely it cleaned my skin. My friend was more fond of this cleanser than I was, and since I have a lot of cleansers right now, I gave it to her to keep.
I bought 3 pairs of shoes recently (on sale – so don’t judge me) and guess what that meant for me – I needed to at least get rid of one pair already in my closet. It’s probably going to be the wedges that need to go to the shoe doctor honestly, but either way – something’s gotta go. And yet, at the same time, if I see a pair of shoes that I HAVE to have, like what happened in Paris, I can’t think about what shoes I’m going to have to give up to have those in my closet while I’m buying them. They’re supposed to make you feel good. You’re supposed to be happy while you’re spending your hard earned money on them. So yes, keep it organized, but don’t ever make it feel like a chore. That’s just so so wrong on every level.
Andrew Love - tenor saxophone
Trent just laughed and noticed a door that had Dr. Osbournes name on it. “Well maybe you should do it as much as you can” he said before knocking on the door.
I have also defined ownership to Google or the Manufacturer as they need to work it out. Unlike apple's iOS, Android has much more complexity as it has to synergize with multiple vendors and a plethora of hardware.
This is who I am: a 27-year old Norfolk native who comes from a family who has established its roots in the city of Norfolk. My grandfather on my mother’s side ran a very successful radiator business for more than 50 years in Norfolk. My grandfather on my father’s side was quite involved in Norfolk politics and was the general manager of a prominent local department store. Interestingly, he also made a run for city treasurer during the 70s, but lost to the incumbent. Ironically, my first job would be working for the city treasurer’s office from 2000-2002 as a seasonal temporary. I often wondered what Granddaddy would have thought of one Mayo making it into the Treasurer’s Office.
No "shape-shifting" shaman from the dim past has ever exceeded their exceptional cunning and guile.
Explain the public purposes of marriage, and then outline three threats to marriage and explain what legislation you would propose to neutralize these threats. What choices should people make before marriage to make sure they will have a stable, loving marriage?
Then added some pretty embellishments around her.
Come on, make that correlation.
First thing this morning I spoke to Kevin, our contracts supremo, about a contract we’ve been negotiating for three months. I think we’re nearly there, but I need to talk to the editor today as there’s one last point that Contracts can’t resolve between themselves.
Your number this month - 15
So, thanks, Ann, for helping me decide to move here (which was apparently a good move, 'cos I'm really happy, gun nuts and fundamentalists notwithstanding), and thanks for helping women in this state and everywhere know that the glass ceiling was made to be broken.
In a bowl combine the sour creme and the egg, mix well. Add the sugar-nut mix.
Some of the principles are not particularly controversial or microfinance-specific – things like a commitment to transparency, innovation, being client-centered, investing in the human capital of employees, promoting gender equality and so on. Others are specific to microfinance, such as bundling financial and human development services wherever possible, measuring and managing social performance on par with financial performance, mobilizing loan capital locally (through savings or local currency borrowings), and local (or indigenous) ownership and governance. Among the latter, there are some thoughtful people in our movement (or industry, as some prefer to call it) who would disagree with the wisdom of these principles. I say that to emphasize that these are not meaningless slogans that everyone agrees on.
At the moment there doesn't seem to be enough hours in the day.
05 - T For Texas 09:25
Could frame thy fearful symmetry?
The nursery rhyme CD we checked out from the library is short. It has 23 tracks about a minute each. You do the math. This means we can listen to the whole thing about 1,278,417 times while sitting in Chicago traffic. And we did.
We all want clients to buy luxury Products and hire professionals who come to the table with realistic expectations, rather than requesting we make their home look like the ones in the magazines. Yes, we probably can. But the occasion they slip off their shoes, let the dog in, or burn the French toast, they are being set up for dissatisfaction that often ends up on our voice mailbox. The solution? Merge the ideal with reality as seamlessly as possible. Make the concluded stock livable, not only luscious. Generate an environment that is both aesthetic and every-day. Every home ought to be one part Archie Bunker and two parts Fred Astaire. Is that possible? Oh yes. That’s why luxury never goes out of style.
So anyway, THE SHOES!!
Meditation: Do you view God’s law negatively or positively? Jesus’ attitude towards the law of God can be summed up in the great prayer of Psalm 119: “Oh, how I love your law! It is my meditation all the day.” For the people of Israel the “law” could refer to the ten commandments or to the five Books of Moses, called the Pentateuch, which explain the commandments and ordinances of God for his people. The “law” also referred to the whole teaching or way of life which God gave to his people. The Jews in Jesus’ time also used it as a description of the oral or scribal law. Needless to say, the scribes added many more things to the law than God intended. That is why Jesus often condemned the scribal law. It placed burdens on people which God had not intended. Jesus, however, made it very clear that the essence of God’s law – his commandments and way of life, must be fulfilled.
This navy blazer, fluid and expressive in shape, is one of the few saving graces in an otherwise graceless tide of overwhelming mediocrity.
3. Kids
Thus, the doors were opened a half-hour earlier.
Then they'll go to their small group tables and begin to write their own thick questions. I'll check those questions before they start taking notes to answer them.
Cole is only 6. He needs those long and fast rides. So far, this spring, we have gone on medium-length moderate rides with Ranger. I have loved every minute of it, but when Ellen said she had to work on a Sunday, I started planning a long and fast ride.
Wanna play? Here are some instructions:
Wednesday, March 7 – Short stories, tall tales, legends
Ironbound Proto-Drake – Glory of the Ulduar Hero 10
4. Annie 'swaddles' again, but this time, it's not with baby Eve.
I'll be around to visit blogs again someday soon.
So here's to my Watermelon Seeds!
We discovered that the refrigerator ice maker had been quietly leaking under the floors. Under the kitchen floor, under the living room floor, and under the laundry room floor. By the time we noticed something was wrong, thousands of dollars worth of damage had been done. Now, we aren’t unobservant. We’ve had water leaks in the past. But generally, a leak is accompanied by pools of water. There was no water. The only noticeable symptom occurred when our two-year-old hardwood floors buckled. That’s when we knew we had a problem. We decided to start back at square one and rethink this whole project. And I am glad we did.
As far as who you would like to take a class with, well if we could get all those artists together for one art retreat, who knows what would happen! Van Gogh and Michelangelo were tied for first choice. Nipping at their heels were Leonardo da Vinci, Mark Rothko, Robert Rauschenberg, Michael deMeng, and Michelle Ward. Wow...Michael and Michelle you keep good company! But I think Lisa Hoffman's answer to this question was my favorite response overall: "Mark Twain. I consider him a brilliant artist, but I'd rather have dinner with him and then sit around for a few hours chatting some more, while we drink brandy and he smokes those cigars. That would give me enough creative energy to last a lifetime!!!...class-schmass."
Then we made a set of little bibs. I've seen these cute triangular bibs in the shops, but all in bright colours. I'm a pink and pool kinda girl so it was time to get stitching. We used terry toweling on the reverse and a bit of velcro at the ends to fasten them.
Is shorter than you're thinking
Me: Pointed at my bib.
But, I pray for help and guidance that I don't do it again and
much of the same. I've been tea dyeing tons of lace for
For the menu, my hope was to settle on the fine line of teen-friendly but new. Food not foreign, and recognizable but not typical. Grilled chicken skewers not nuggets. We made three dipping sauces to appeal to all palates. There was a crudite platter. The teeny-tiny potatoes were roasted with Rosemary-Orange Salt.
The Arabs supported the Nazis during the war for the most part. In Iraq, a Nazi friendly Arab government took power and launched a pogrom on Jews in Baghdad that killed almost 200 people. The 'Palestinian' leader the British appointed, Haj Amin al-Husseini was the man who originally translated Hitler's 'Mein Kampf ' into Arabic, where it translates into 'My Jihad' and is still a bestseller in the Middle East today.
When we came we had our main skills in knitwear, but that’s one thing at the factory. As a designer, whatever I need to make in my fashion show, in my collection, I make,” Angela replies. There’s an observation that Angela makes about the market in India. “What I realise is that (international) brands sell shoes and accessories here.
What isn’t spoken
And, I decided, that although we did not know if we were going to have a boy or a girl our baby needed a name.
SAT. 9/27 - JETSTREAM @ THE OLD TOWNE PUB IN PASADENA, 9:30pm, with the Sundowners at 11pm. 66 N. Fair Oaks Ave., behind the big ugly Container Store. Enter thru alley off of Holly St. 626-577-6583. Probably a $5 cover. Jet's Rockin' jam band.
The TSA has expanded its mission to terrorize the public from airports to bus terminals, subway platforms and Amtrak stations. If the mega-agency is allowed to continue this expansion – something Congress has given it a green light to do – we can expect to be sexually molested, forced through cancer-inducing naked body porno scanners, and psychologically tortured at the local mall and on street corners around the nation.
Activity: go to the computer lab and give time for students to search through this decomposer website. Ask them to investigate, find characteristics, their job and role. There is also an interesting interview to a worm they could read. They should make a deep research because the following day they will be exploring a decomposer habitat. They should take down notes in their notebooks about new facts they learn. Some of the following questions can be used to guide this web investigation:
But I know dad the ice is getting thin
However sometimes we do have trouble staying in a fight when we find that our standards-bearers seem more interested in stepping out of the ring to cut deals with our enemies than in, y'know, bearing our standard.
‘You are what you eat’ shout the magazines from the stand, proclaiming miracle bikini diets and portraying pictures of celebrity bodies. I choose to ignore the pressures as I make a cheeky detour to the chocolate isle. Instead my mind wanders to planning my holiday reading and am hit by the challenge…
Undoubtedly, the male and female sex organs are designed to complement one another and are necessary to produce babies. But sexuality means much more than reproduction. This insight seems to be confirmed by the complementary account of Creation provided in Genesis chapter 2. God, we are told, was strangely sympathetic to the loneliness of Adam, observing that within the universe he had so conspicuously pronounced “good” there was, nevertheless, a significant omission. It was “not good” for the man to be alone (Genesis 2:18). In the following verses, we are given another account of the purpose of sexuality: not procreation this time, but companionship. In other words, a primary creation purpose of sex is interpersonal intimacy. Sex as a profound expression of love and mutuality is something most of us accept gratefully as a good part of God’s good world. It is a marvel, a mystery and a grace that babies can come from ecstasy, but the ecstasy does not require babies to justify it.
I finally got the balls to break out the 2 HUGE blank canvases that I've had hanging on the wall for the past year. A 48 x 48 and a 36 x 48 that Miles and the kids bought me for Christmas, Mother's Day. I'd been reluctant to paint on them-their size was a little intimidating and I had a hard time getting my head around how much paint they would use up! But yesterday morning I thought, "At least throw a base layer of color on-get the juices rolling and perhaps the muse will overshadow the fear. These big, blank, plastic wrapped canvases on our bedroom walls are USELESS and look like shite."
One-day tickets are $99 and three day passes cost $298.
Excuse the depressive tone of my post, I just feel particularly desperate tonight. If nothing else, it feels good to get this out.
The challenge? Did Dr. Bob’s younger days in church, his prayer meetings, and Christian Endeavor impact on his later beliefs, actions, A.A. ideas, and the “fixing” of drunks in Akron AA.? Another challenge: What was the background of Christian Endeavor itself; and what ideas of that society bear resemblance to those of pioneer AA? Still another challenge: What, in context, was Dr. Bob’s real view of church, of clergy, of prayer, of prayer meetings, of the Christian Endeavor program, and of the Bible itself?
for my brother, i sewed up a lap blanket with his favorite baseball team on one side and cozy flannel on the other side. he's happy and warm sitting with it as he watches tv today. i secured the two layers with a some gently curvy stitch lines from top to bottom.
Next time a new campaign brief comes around, it might be worth us all looking in the lost property box of previous advertising to see if there’s anything lurking inside that might be worth reuniting the British public with. You never know, you might find something genuinely valuable in there.
Today’s question, and my response:
This didn’t exactly impress the officials who promptly surrounded him brandishing loaded machine guns, arrested him and threw him in jail.
So, I make up my own news. It’s much more interesting, and while not factual for the most part, is in my eyes, a decent example of why creative humor-journalism could save lives and end wars. Afterall - doesn't a spoonful of sugar help the anti-psychotic pain-killing happy pill go down?.
A detailed analysis (in english) of the Snow White frescoe is available on the internet in the study by Michel Conan, Landscape design and the experience of motion, 2003, p. 309-315. Indeed, Pecqueur's frescoe has been constructed in the style of a comic book, producing a cinematic, motion rich scene.
Welcome back, TV Tourists.
Happy Mother’s Day indeed!
B. … no evidence at all.
Kenneth wanted to join in the fight, but he knew that this wasn’t his fight. His lay beyond the borders of human dreams and imagination. Both his and Kayla’s.
Nick’s issue with the show also popped up with the Mars episode. In the episode the kids fly all the way to Mars and land at the base of Olympus Mons and then spend the majority of the episode climbing the mountain by foot while Rocket changes shape and drives up next to them. This is where Nick lost it.
Pumpkin, being a low acid food, must be pressure canned. I placed my filled jars into my pressure canner (follow the directions that come with your pressure canner). I processed my pint jars at 10 pounds of pressure for 55 minutes (quarts would be processed for 90 minutes).
in heaven there are dahlias
A least with aviation,
So here’s me pouring out a root beer for the old Halls of Hysteria. We’ll not see her kind again.
Self-sacrificial love is an unheard of concept, and is detestable to our human nature.
The Summer Blockbuster
“Thanks Danny” Trent responded before sitting down and relaxing, crossing his legs and leaning back with his hands behind his head. Geoff sat down in the other chair, resting his forearms on his legs and leaning forward slightly.
-I got my kitty to purr into the microphone. I'm not sure it picked up but I hope it did.
Samson and Denial is a must-read for all horror fans - actually it's a novella for anyone who likes a quick, thrilling read. The Kindle edition is available for a mere $2.99.
Fast forward now to 2007 and the brouhaha about raising the retirement age is in full swing. Young pilots rabid about the potential for stifled growth because the old guys won't leave. United ALPA took a vote and it was about 70-30 against raising the age limit. Of course the rest of the world was going to do it, The US government was going to do it, and so ALPA national rolled over and acquiesced to it. But had it depended on a straw vote it would have failed, and age 60 would have remained the law. Never at any time did I hear a younger pilot express anything except WHAT PERSONALLY BENEFITTED HIM. The greater good, others needs, the ultimate benefit to him monetarily, all were ignored. It was me, me , me like a broken record. Not vey impressive from an ethical standpoint. Pretty poor.
my palette is loaded with
Your Angel guidance is to examine yourself and your current situations in depth so that you have a crystal clear awareness of the underlying reasons for challenges and repeated scenarios. Understanding your base motivations and thoughts behind the choices you have made help you transform them.
On top of that, the blasted alarm clock went off in the middle of such an exciting film/story of a dream this morning. I've been scribbling like mad, trying to get all the pieces down, but I missed the ending, and didn't even get to find out the hero's name - the heroine was just about to call out to him, as a wave took him under, when the furshlugginer alarm jangled me awake.
Despite all the affected teenage rebellion, I continued to call myself a Christian into my early twenties. When I finally stopped, it wasn’t because being a believer made me uncool or outdated or freakish. It was because being a Christian no longer meant anything. It was a label to slap on my Facebook page, next to my music preferences. The gospel became just another product someone was trying to sell me, and a paltry one at that because the church isn’t Viacom: it doesn’t have a Department of Brand Strategy and Planning. Staying relevant in late consumer capitalism requires highly sophisticated resources and the willingness to tailor your values to whatever your audience wants. In trying to compete in this market, the church has forfeited the one advantage it had in the game to attract disillusioned youth: authenticity. When it comes to intransigent values, the profit-driven world has zilch to offer. If Christian leaders weren’t so ashamed of those unvarnished values, they might have something more attractive than anything on today’s bleak moral market. In the meantime, they’ve lost one more kid to the competition.
Yesterday the 9th of February was my birthday and being my 21st I guess you could say it was a milestone. Not that it was a terribly exciting day. I still had to get up at 6am in the morning when the birdies were still rubbing the sleep out of their eyes in order to get to my pattern making class on time. When I finished that I had to commute home, quickly get changed and go to work until 9.30pm! Phew what a day! But heck, who's going to party on a Tuesday night anyway? After all, I had fashion design class in the morning!
In 2011, I had over 50 articles published, most of them news stories, but also book reviews, business profiles, personal essays, and this blog. They weren’t all great; sometimes the constraints of research to deadline made for unforeseen challenges and not necessarily exemplary writing. Sometimes the stories were slightly dull to begin with, and I was hard-pressed to breathe some life into them. But I also produced some good articles, and had good feedback from my editors and readers.
The greater the diversity in biological forms, the better the health of the ecosystem. Biodiversity can be seen prominently in tropical climates where many diverse species of micro organisms, plants, animals and birds are to be found. Polar Regions on the other hand can support fewer species and therefore are poorer in biodiversity.
9:01 - Call Meagan to back out of zoo trip
I congratulate each one of you for completing the two arduous years successfully at the IWSB. I do hear many of you sharing, how these two years have been transformational. I still can vividly recall the outbound we went two years ago on our induction program as you all entered the institution. Congratulations to the Scholars of Excellence and those who have made it to the Awards List too. We are very proud of you. I wish you all the best as you embark on the journey of realizing your dreams. As you set about charting new career paths, I urge all of you to pursue what you enjoy and enjoy whatever you pursue. I am sure you will be of immense value to the organizations that you contribute and also to the society at large. You are, and will always be, an integral part of the IWSB family, and we look forward to sharing in the joys of your accomplishments as corporate leaders, entrepreneurial leaders and worthy citizens of this world.
I just got a delivery of yarn! A yarn delivery is always a mood lifter, but this one is particularly good as a) it was an excellent price b) it is for a pattern I am utterly in love with an am dying to make and c) did I mention it was an excellent price? Oh yes! My LYS are selling this yarn for a whopping £5.99 a skein. I just paid £2.50 per skein from Kemps Wool Shop! I am SO happy that I not only found the perfect yarn for the pattern but got it for such a good price too!
Whew! I was just over in the Kindle forums and had a huge awakening. It was like BAM! A brain shattering slap in the face before I even got my head through the door. I rarely (never) go into the site, but decided I would check it out. I recently heard this was the place to go if you wanted to promote your books. OMG, I think I will continue doing as I have been. I will stay away from that forum.
eryl!
Lionel Stander A Star is Born
When I saw this truck at night, I just loved it for some reason! My mom was nice enough to stop the car so I could get a good shot. :-P
The morning after the night before (which is another blog altogether) we sneaked out of Dave's uncle's house (where we had sneaked in at 1am when everyone was in bed), leaving behind only an apologetic bottle of Vitesse Noir on the table as evidence that we had actually been there.
I don’t claim to have all the answers on how to address this, and I’m not going to advocate that we stop buying some of those luxury items entirely, but I am advocating a more responsible approach to wealth and money. And especially during the Holiday season, that phrase, “holiday” originally meant Holy Day. They’re meant to be days set aside for reflection, gratitude, and rejoicing with family and friends. And we’ve made them into a celebration of consumerism. I’m reminded of Jesus’ words when he cleared out the temple- “My Father’s house is to be a house of prayer and you’ve made it into a robber’s den.” What would happen in the temple is that Jews would come to exchange their different kinds of currency for whatever kind was neccesary to buy the animal required for their sacrifice. And what the money changers would do is cheat the poor who came in to exchange their money. It’d be like if today you went to Canada and wanted to exchange 60 American dollars- according to the exchange rate they should give you $100 Canadian in exchange. But now imagine if they gave you $30 Canadian instead. That’s what the money lenders would do. In one sense, they’re far more brazen about their greed than we are. It’s not as if we’re taking money directly from a poor single mother in the Sudan, but in another sense, we’re no different from the money lenders.
Sue VanHattum
When we got to the park we saw the activities the fraternity had planned for the kids and decided it would be fun to stay and hang out. Princess and Popeye jumped right in, whereas the big boys were too cool for skool and hung out on the playground instead. Toward the end, the big boys were wishing they had got in on the fun. Oh well, live and learn, and plan for next year.
I won the lottery back in 1999.
Warning, some NSFW language.
Nemesis .Philip Roth
The actual answer is something that vaguely resembles the plot of Bram Stoker's Dracula but Argento has finally figured out what we all missing from the story, a praying mantis.
There are a number of reasons why it has been nearly 4 years and I have not featured anything from the borough of Staten Island. It is far, inconvenient, and perhaps I was a little lazy. The photo explains another one reason. The current fare going to Staten Island across the Verrazano Narrows Bridge is $11 one way (it is free on the return trip). That two-digit fare is just frightening. The bridge can be spectacular, however. See my posting on it here and an additional photo gallery here.
Canoeing gets you back close to nature, using a method of travel that does not even call for roads or paths. You are following nature’s roads; you are choosing the road less travelled, as Robert Frost once wrote in another context, and that makes all the difference. You discover a sort of simplifying of your values, a distinction between those artificially created and those that are necessary to your spiritual and human development. – Pierre Elliott Trudeau
Its gorgeous, simple, and well thought out. Its not ostentatious or overbearing, and exudes all the clarity of idea and calm that one expects to feel when arriving at their holiday house.
So for those that have submitted questions...I haven't forgotten, I'm still working on it.
One sunny day, in July, I had a craving for onion dip. I can't recall the last time I've eaten onion dip. What I do remember is that the recipe consisted of a packet of onion soup mix was stirred into sour cream. I don't stock that product, any longer. How hard could it be to make onion dip from scratch, I wondered? I did a bit of research on the internet, and decided to come up with my own version.
After dinner I thought OK I feel good and I waited a good 40 minutes (don't even know if that's to long or short) and test 6.4.
(I did come across one Web site that simply said that coupon clipping services are also illegal, but that was it. No links, notations, explanations, nothing. But I came across at least a dozen others who beg to differ. I’ve used them three times myself without hassle. And I imagine that since they advertise publicly, they have no fear of being prosecuted. So until I hear otherwise, I feel comfortable telling you that they are a legal means by which to get extra coupons.)
While Jesus was on earth and all through His ministry, the Pharisees gave Him great opposition because of their religious fervency. Religion kept the Pharisees from worshipping their Messiah even as it kept Saul of Tarsus from accepting the proclamation of the risen Lord.
- Dip in milk and flour.
From there, we headed on over to the stables for some 1-on1 time with many horsies, & kitties, too! Here are some of my favorite photos I caught from the day in Pretty, Sunny SoCal….
Boston Beer's representatives didn't know there was a real Sam Adams running for mayor when the letter was sent, and has previously run "Sam Adams for President" marketing campaigns.
Her: I am finished with my list.
Me and Daddy: Oh really?! What is it saying?
Granted puffas, YakTrax and thermal vests aren’t exactly rising mercury must-haves but a back up of merino wool crew necks never did any harm I say. Only recently I spotted a two snugly but spring-appropriate sweaters in a Grafton Street retail establishment. Within days they were replaced with cropped shirts and striped skater skirts before I even had a chance to extract my credit card from the bottom of my bag (a.k.a. Pandora’s Box; pit of despair; valley of no-return).
To preview song, open iTunes to buy and download music.
Exhale. He pulls the trigger, the tiny hammer set to strike the middle barrel. The gun kicks and the flying round catches something in the air, something in mid leap and closing; the round sends it sprawling, course ballistically altered. Bruce pops the cylinder again and pulls the smoking shell free his his gloved hand. The shell goes in the another pocket, his eyes never leaving the form now moving spasmodically across the alley. It quickly slows and after a moment the form is still.
Many wonder about the true meaning of art in tombs. Do they all have the same meaning? Or does each culture have their own reason behind painting elaborate scenes on tomb walls that no one may ever see?
Stevens, David - WHITE FOR DANGER
Fans started asking about more details but he just kept giving short hints like:
Mary Pickford and Meryl Streep. I would love to hear them exchange their experiences as women in the industry and gain some insight into how much or how little has changed in 80 years. Then I’d like Louis CK to come for dessert because he’s hilarious and it could be a cool or disastrous wild card.
According to a survey the Canary Review did in August, 61.5% of book reviewers polled said that the blurb could be the sole factor in their decision to read a book (with politeness, friendliness, and originality of the email straggling in next). And in an average week, 49% of the book reviewers surveyed receive 10-20 book review requests. So do what you need to do to rise above the slushpile–finishing a book is just the beginning.
Set the tone or others will set it for you.
Paula George
And now here we are
I'm really thankful for the Weasley China Cabinet (don't you like how it's earned an official name?). It provides some much needed storage for the living room, which freed up storage in the kitchen. I also made use of our non-working retro radio console by storing all my candles in the top.
7- Place the baking tray into the oven for about 15 to 20 minutes or till it gains a nice golden color, test it for doneness and take it out if done.
What difference does it make?
Kapferer, Bruce 1997a The Feast of the Sorcerer. Practices of Consciousness and Power, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
‘He wasn’t all that good. I wouldn’t say he was dangerously ill but he just said he didn’t feel all that right. They kept asking him to drink water.
I just used standard Burda measurements for size 34 to test it, so it wasn't me taking wrong measurements, it was a programming issue. I mean, it is an over $200 piece of software- this is a lot of money for a faulty fit like that. I just have no intention of going back to it, and it is off my Recommended list for good.
Funnily enough, I was on eBay searching for a turkey platter to send to my daughter in New York, when I came across a link to The Old Vicarage in Priors Marston, Warwickshire. The sale was scheduled for Saturday, October 22 and Sunday, October 23.
This is insane, right?
Cheesecloth, Stickles, 3D Gloss, Die-cut, Twinklets & Dew Drops from my stash
The third time I went out, I struggled and struggled and all the miserableness of high school running rushed back to me. I didn’t make it even as far as my first day’s goal had been. And then – with calves so tight and painful that John had to live with a backdrop of moaning for another 4 or 5 days, and the memory of running misery fresh in my mind – that was it. I haven’t ventured out again in about 2 weeks, and won’t be going this week either. I don’t know what the problem was, really. Was I too ambitious? Did I start too fast or too long? Do I just hate running? Either way, hopefully I will be able to find it out and eradicate it, or find a different, enjoyable, non-expensive form of exercise.
Happy Valentines Day!!! I hope that you all have a GRAND day today :) Me? What do I have planned for today? Um, well, I'd like to sleep in - hehehehe. We'll see how far that goes - LOL! The little ones tend to get up at the same time reguardless of when they were put to bed. Ha!
Your tip this month –Think about forgiving someone who's close to you.
Sean answered, crinkling his brow at Bryn. He was already dressed for work--blue shirt with the sleeves rolled up, cargo pants, and boots. "What?"
At FSU all first year TAs teach First Year Composition. We have the option of picking one of several “strands” which come with syllabus outlines and assignment suggestions. The strand system is a great one for first year teachers. It gives us enough of a built in structure to make sure that there is consistency across freshmen comp. But it also gives us a lot of flexibility in picking a strand that works for us and in adapting it in ways that allow us to develop and compliment our own teaching style and interests. I already have my eye on a strand with a creative writing emphasis. We also have the option of designing our own strands and special topics to teach after our first year.
1.) Buying a big bag of dried beans is cheaper than buying as many cans of beans! (And that's saying something, because canned beans are already kind of cheap.)
Accompanies my soul as
Brandon Holstein: You’re listed at about 6-1 230 lbs. which some consider to be a little undersized for an NFL linebacker. How do you back that up and what do you say when people question how you will hold up in the NFL due to your limited size?
With strained eyes; “lonely–I’ve come to be,” he screams.
Of the fully embraced multiplicity
Here's what we analyzed with Sarah: Writing dialogue without committing the heinous writer's crime of "He said, adoringly." Check. Making the torture and murder of chickens interesting. Check. Artistic character development: At night, accompanied by a storm lantern and a cat, in preparation for a family party, a man strings lights into the trees of a 300-year-old orchard. He sits at the base of a tree and weeps at the thought of losing his mother, but not before carefully removing, folding and placing his glasses in his pocket. Check. Writing things that make no fucking sense, so as to confuse and dazzle readers with your deep and mysterious obscurity. Check. Showing (rather than telling) poverty through images of hanging meat and a flowered dress/combat boots ensemble. Check.
I am the first to admit that I am a huge fan of the giddy moments behind the black curtain of a photobooth anxiously anticipating the 1st, 2nd, 3rd and 4th unique poses of the classic 2" x 6" photo frame. Luckily my daughter Nina loves the booth too. Above is a MagFrame from last Saturday’s visit to the San Francisco Renegade Craft Fair. The props we selected were a fuzzy-eared cap and a silk rose. We decided to role play the big bad wolf (me) and the beautiful, unsuspecting damsel (Nina.)
The Bathroom:
You can stick the kettle on and find me a cup.
You have a good holiday last week? I spent mine in the land of Charles Portis, William Harrison, John Hornor Jacobs and Don Lee - and the personal punching bag of Steve Weddle - Arkansas. Does that do anything to your cockles? You likey the mythological American South? Can you just taste the eminent publication of William Gay's The Lost Country? Y'know what you might be looking for? Fall Line by Joe Samuel Starnes. I'm taking my time with it, 'cause it's not in a hurry, and I'm liking that juuuuuust fine. I'm sure I'll have more to say when I'm through, but yeah, I think I'm way safe recommending it to you. Especially now that it's gettin nippy out. I'm finding more time to read for some reason.
It still hasn't quite sunk in that Friday is my graduation from my language school. And that a month from now I'm going to be starting another chapter of my academic life. And that that new chapter will be all kinds of terrifying... But at this exact moment I'm really too zen to stress out about that.
To love me, without pretending
Whilst clearing the very over grown garden and cutting down a rather large and unruly 'bush' the gardeners come back to me and asked me if I knew I had a two storey building at the back of the garden!
I have read this but honestly preferred the film. It is still on my bookshelf though, so I guess I score one point here.
Hours after the act passed, presidential candidate Rick Santorum was granted Secret Service protection. For the American protester, this indeed means that glitter-bombing the former Pennsylvania senator is officially a very big no-no, but it doesn’t stop with just him. Santorum’s coverage under the Secret Service began on Tuesday, but fellow GOP hopeful Mitt Romney has already been receiving such security. A campaign aide who asked not to be identified confirmed last week to CBS News that former House Speaker Newt Gingrich has sought Secret Service protection as well. Even former contender Herman Cain received the armed protection treatment when he was still in the running for the Republican Party nod.
Taxpayers were also expected to fork out millions more on Cele's legal fees.
Thanks for stopping by to visit my blog today! I hope that you have maybe found an idea for storage - I have had fun sharing how I have mine set up in my workspace. I have lots of supplies but it has taken me years to collect all of this - one item at a time! The table to the left of my workdesk holds my sewing machine and my Big Shot and my Cuttlebug (this table completes the square of my workspace and you can see that on my photos in the first post). I have storage for my sewing and dollmaking which I can share at another time. Wishing you a creative day with your own supplies tomorrow!
Ottawa Heart Institute Professor Fraser Rubens, who treated Al Raas in 2002, has given his support to those calling for clemency. Prof Rubens has written publicly to say that incarceration will place Al Raas’ life in jeopardy. “I am also concerned that he will be inordinately at risk of hemorrhage should he suffer any injury,” added the surgeon.
Waking in the middle of the night with a fantastic idea for that sales pitch, turning on your laptop and typing it up may sound like a good idea; but don’t sit for hours on end staring at a computer screen in a dark room. This can cause your eyes to strain too much in order to focus on the bright light coming from the laptop screen.
Great Divide Brewing Company Belgica
Lies that life is black and white
Paprika, for dusting
I posted that same note in the SIMEGEN Group on Facebook, where one of the fans of Sime~Gen (a group of fans who have produced more words of fan fiction in the Sime~Gen Universe than Jean Lorrah and I have produced professionally published Sime~Gen).
Ephesians 4:12-13 reads, "Their responsibility is to equip God’s people to do his work and build up the church, the body of Christ until we come to such unity in our faith and knowledge of God’s Son that we will be mature and full grown in the Lord, measuring up to the full stature of Christ. " (NLT)Our goal as parents is future tense. We are working towards maturity which is a continuum. As a pastor to teens, my primary problem is not with a teen who is acting 16, it's with a parent who is. If we all learned to act our age, we'd be better off across the board in my opinion.
music and sound engineer,
Support – The sites hosts a user community forum to share information and troubleshooting guide
When first starting out though you might want to stick with products that have a little less competition, these are the products that will have a gravity score of around 20 to 50.
I will try and update often on the twins and their reactions and experiences here: Paris is their oyster!
After perusing their woefully barren gift shop (talk about a missed opportunity!), we went back to the hotel to get ready for our outing to a really fancy restaurant. But just as we were about to leave, we passed by the tour booking center and heard this little tidbit, like a money-grubbing fairy on the wind:
PatHaith (Lab) 1049
“We all are perhaps desperate to know what is on the other side of the veil after we die,” Mr. Baugher said, adding that his initial skepticism about the Burpo family’s story was short-lived. “This was a very down-to-earth, conservative, quote-unquote normal Midwestern family. We became fully convinced that this story was valid. And also that it was a great story that would just take off.”
Max, who immediately starts talking about how cafeteria food is beneath him, chooses the Blue Team, Christian, Alejandra, Guiseppe, Tony, Tracy, Esther, and Jennifer. Derrick, as the Red Team leader, picks Suzy, Adrien, Alvin, Ben, Erryn, Jennie, and Christine. Already Suzy is nervous because she’s not a team leader, and Tony thinks he and Max are going to have issues. (Understatement alert!)
So, let’s look at each in turn (my opinion may not be valid on some as I have not seen them)
Every year, as we keep the dolls on the steps, we reminisce about how we got the doll. Other conversation invariably revolves around how the quality of the dolls are not up to the mark. I can actually see that here… the dolls we have inherited from my great grandparents look so good even after all these years, but those we got recently are broken, faded. It feels like the artisans of yore actually took pleasure doing the dolls while the newer ones are more of a commercial venture?! Or is it just my random thought?
To the turkey egg mixture, add the remaining ingredients and mix with the wooden spoon to a consistancy to hold the form of a ball.
I also saved the middle of the A,B,O,R so I could put the dot's back in the center.
"Ready To Rock" - 3:24
At each Bethesda Art Fair for the past five years, Mr. 12 devonshire and I have admired the large scale, bold, cheerful and colorful paintings of David Oleski. One day... we would say...
I don't have all the answers, and I'm I'm not ashamed to admit it. When I teach, and a student asks me a question I can't answer, I'm not afraid to say "I don't know." But then as soon as I can, I get on the internet or go to the library, and I do some research and I find out the answer. Because I want to know. I hate not knowing. Same goes for when my kids ask me something I don't know the answer to - if I don't know the answer, we go on a mission to find it together, and we don't stop until we find it.
“She was more proud of getting a boyfriend than anything,” mom said. Neither woman can be identified because the now 25-year-old woman is an alleged victim of sexual assault and human trafficking. But that boyfriend and others seized on her insecurities and led her down a path of drugs to a hollow place of abuse, violence and degradation.
But somehow I feel they aren't being completely honest with me.
This is so much more than a support group, it is more than parent education. This is a group that has made such a tremendous difference in our lives.
Opening the enclosure was easy, six self-tapping screws per side and four in the middle. Last owner was apparently using this monitor with wall mount. The plastic panel got off with a little prying with plastic knife. Under the plastic was metallic shield, apparently to reduce RF-signals. The 12-volt input goes to diode, few caps, electronic capacitors.
- The psychology of character - and how understanding it can aid in self-discipline continually bringing you closer to the life of your dreams
The Wellbrook 1530S+, I was informed by Andy Ikin, has an Antenna Factor of 1dB/m.
Does this mean that Moorcock glorifies these horrific qualities like cruelty, incest, drug use, and genocide? No, not anymore than Tolkien glorified war.
If I make 16 walks in May, I have achieved 100% of my fitness goals. Now, about the diet goals…I’m not the type of person who can stop eating sweets completely, and so I’ll try to consume sweets no more than twice a week. When I was fit, I had sweets no more than once a week. Maybe this will happen for me in June.
Tomorrow and all next week is to be crazy:)!
I do also understand it is next to impossible for a new temporary agency nurse to get all the medication right for all the new patients, when she does not even know where all the medication is, or now even the faces of the patients .. so my father often did not get all of his need mediation as a result because there seemed to be always a new nurse . Not acceptable.
Just ... gross.
Occasionally, if I was feeling especially proud of the stock in the lunch kitchen I'd stick a post-it (or recycled envelope) on the inside of the "lunch cabinet". Not being a morning person, Ella was always appreciative since it takes a lot of thought out of lunch packing.
This perception may have special meaning in a French court, where judges participate in both the investigations and the jury deliberations, in a system that prioritizes the pursuit of justice over the protocol of due process as found in American and English courts.”
"Barley and Grape Rag" – 3:39
As it was I was just mortified. My drinking partner was howling with laughter as she pulled me back up onto the platform, and the security guard wandered off telling someone at the end of his mobile what he had just found, in a voice loud enough for anyone within several kilometres to hear.
–How has my community helped revealed and embodied God’s presence in my life and in the community?
Today we learned how to set up a sterile field, drop sterile items on that field and how to put on sterile gloves. We also learned sterile dressing changes and removal of sutures among other things. We only had a few hours of lab today as our morning was filled with necessary paperwork. It’s my understanding that from here on out, we will have one full day of lab and one full day of lecture each week…
Well HE rolled into town
The 97 cents I earned was my reward for taking a risk on my hunch that two cups of coffee would be more valuable downstairs than upstairs.
I took exception to the early tone being set, one of minor celebration. Considering that he died at a relatively early age, considering that he leaves a wife and four young children, I described it as despicable and distasteful. There are times when political differences are irrelevant. In response I was given a link to another blog and asked, once I read it, if I would feel the same way. This is part of what I read;
(Fareda enters.)
If you find time to write in this form, please share your work with us, or perhaps you will find inspiration in the music and artwork featured here, and prefer to write something in your usual style. There is no time limit to our creativity, so I would encourage you to come back to this idea at a more convenient time, if you are unable to write this weekend.
So, we went in, found our seats and sat quietly, waiting for it to begin.
1 broomsticks
.63″ w x
03 Jersey Bounce
2 lbs may not sound like a lot, but when it’s on the back of your hand, it’s more than enough(I’ve only used 1 lb on each hand so far)! Using the weighted gloves will not only make my workout harder, but also improve strength and power(not speed though, most people think the same about warming up for baseball with a weight around the bat, but it actually slows down the swing).
Not the lines of age and pain,
Thanks Drayton.
Passes are not purchased directly through Time Travelers; they are purchased through a participating institution. My pass is through the Minnesota Historical Society and is valid for one year. My $75 Household Membership gets me into all 26 historic sites managed by the Minnesota Historical Society for free, plus offers a gift shop discount. Additionally, I reap all the benefits of the Time Travelers program. Since receiving my pass last fall I have visited these participating institutions:
Global Research has also become a source of specialized information and analysis for journalists, senior government officials, financial analysts and non-governmental organizations.
Plays a role in collagen synthesis: skin becomes softer, more resilient, hair and nails grow faster and stronger (the beauty mineral)
Hello, my lovely children.
So the doctor said: ‘Ok and what do you want me to do?’
Right. Here we are:
“It’s really okay” I said
Fax: (770) 951-0933
This one was easier to follow at the beginning. The second book flowed easier in the very beginning and continued throughout.
“We didn’t chase him off, Mr. Sanders, honestly. He got mad about something we were discussing and just got up and left.”
It is this young generation, the ones that care, the ones with their eyes open to what is really happening in the world, these are the ones that will change the things that need changing.
wild wisdom walking free
“That’s…horrible.”
Steinbeck says:
International Exhibition – 9th November opening, 10th – Jan 2013
In any case, I have decided that I have more coordination and less distractions this time around (although there is a bus ride involved, and I could go for some french fries…), that I will be a less disastrous skier.
Step - 3, fitting the splash back.
25. Caffeine causes negative moods, anger, violence, anxiety, excess worry, frustration and depression.
Baby corn, broken into thirds
With this new life comes a daunting task when he is whisked away to Romania to read two hundred years worth of journals. These are not journals of any ordinary man or woman, but a priest that was maliciously turned into a vampire.
Founder: Carl Davidson
In recent months, though, some SEC officials have grown frustrated by what they claim is direct obstruction of a few investigations and a larger number of probes where lawyers coach clients in the art of resisting and rebuffing. The tactics include witnesses “forgetting” what happened and companies conducting internal investigations that scapegoat junior employees and let senior managers off the hook, agency officials say. “The problem of less-than-candid testimony … is a serious one,” Robert Khuzami, the SEC’s director of enforcement, said at a conference last month. The stepped-up scrutiny is aimed at both internal and outside lawyers.
Makin the
"Plaid Tidings in 2012"?
Saint Cittinus looked into Peredur’s eyes. Those cracked lips moved. Instead of ‘I thirst,’ the saint spoke clearly, if softly. “We have no one else to fear,” he said, “but our Lord God. Who is in Heaven.”
Regarding the “40-Day Prosperity Plan,” I can honestly say it has been one of the most exciting (and certainly, most Prospering) Metaphysical Methods that I have ever learned and used. I taught this method to the participants of the “Divine Prosperity Event” I led in March of this year at the Seasonal Health Wellness Center in Hoboken, New Jersey (www.seasonalhealth.com) and have also taught it to two private Prosperity Class students. I have no doubt I shall teach it again in a group setting. For those of you that wish to learn about it, I highly recommend The Abundance Book, by John Randolph Price.
DE: The whole experience of apartheid and opposing it. Coming to Britain and working with aspirant writers in inner city areas like Scotland Road and Liverpool 8. The love of some very interesting women. Parenthood. Travel in Europe.
The night before you make the chili soak 2-3 cups dried white beans in about 8 cups of water. In the morning drain off the water.
Right from a very early age, I had always been fascinated by mysterious and mythological creatures, making my eventual cryptozoological career little short of inevitable. And so it was that a certain episode of a Western show that my family and I viewed one Sunday afternoon on British television during the mid-1960s, when I was around six years old, engaged my attention to a far greater degree than might otherwise have been expected, given the fact that, normally, the Western genre held little if any interest for me.
That is exactly what you get with Email Marketing.
I'm sure you'll see lots more pennant ideas over the year, as the set has so many possibilities. Until next time, thanks for visiting & leave a comment if you'd like any more info on anything.
Sotheby's got $3.7 million for Van Dongen's "Woman with a Hat of Roses" on May 5, but another Van Dongen consigned to that sale was withdrawn by the seller at the last minute. In all, seven paintings by the artist have gone unsold this auction season, up from three last year, according to Art Research Technologies.
I'm very excited to announce that I have five pairs of tickets to London's Fashion Week to giveaway courtesy of Lavazza the official sponsor of LFW. Please read the information below and make sure you read the terms and conditions - some of these tickets will be for during the week so you need to be able to take time off work. For this reason this competition will only be open until midnight on Sunday 12th February.
1. Roast Beef at Kincaid’s on Redondo Beach, Los Angeles
The only way we can eradicate this evil is to first say to ourselves: “We are not at fault.” All too often we think we are to blame for these conditions, but it is not so. Remember, no love is worth suffering pain and abuse. There is help and you must seek it.
yout-seed = outside
When I trimmed the top edge of the new big module and saw how much of the wedge was left, the top right section needed more complexity. I shifted the ruler and left myself an extra quarter-inch in case the new seams took up too much height.
"There is this simultaneous embracing of Indians, which allows Americans to make claims of American identity. But at the same time, in order to make a real physical nation, they have to dispossess those Indians" This led to policies of Indian removal in the 1830's, and the attempts to physically erase and assimilate Indigenous peoples. For "Americans" to lay claim to "their" nation, they had to get rid of the original inhabitants of "their land'. Throughout US history, donning redface has shifted and symbolized any number of movements, from rebellion to peace activism. But "real" Indians are always left out of the narrative. Americans are far too obsessed with their commodified and imagined images of "the Indian" to be concerned with true authenticity.
– Gregory Corso
It wasn’t that she hadn’t seen them before, it was just that she’d never seen them this close up and personal. She’d never really been interested in men’s footwear, so even she was surprised by the fact she was taking the time to study them.
Chapter 2 - Mountains
You make me dance like a fool, forget how to breathe
How our ancestors lived
Willing to be placed in Surabaya
My first love is not actual an item from my closet but it is my MAC Fuchsia lip pencil, wear it almost everyday.
Experts have said the results are 'very encouraging' and were a 'paradigm' shift in treatment of the disease.
'cause the game's gonna last all night.
20 workers at $12.50 per day ($250 cost)
Today I am here to share with you my take on the Clean and Simple Stamping sketch for this week....
We really are so blessed to be able to enjoy this trip. Caleb has been amazing and going with the flow on where we take him. When we started this our prayers were always that the Lord led us to the child He had for us. We could never have dreamed for a better fit. He just amazes us. I know once home this boy is going to just blossom and learn so many new things from his brother and sisters (Nate dad told me to remind you they better be all good things...lol). Thanks again for all your continued prayers. We are so grateful to everyone.
Our sea life is never poached and our corals are not harvested live. Our sea life comes from reputable sources - ones that adhere to strict environmental standards which protect endangered species and regulate how sea life is harvested -- both which are very important and are in line with our own values and views. Most of our corals are vintage or farm raised and most shells are beautiful byproducts of the food industry.
But airline representatives are frustrated with that metric because it averages wait times at 23 airports, when the longest lines tend to occur at major international gateways like New York, Newark, Miami and Los Angeles. The agency’s average also does not capture the fact that maximum waiting times can exceed an hour at busy times of the day, with far shorter lines when few international flights land.
Their Everyman Begins
Unable to carry enough fuel for a round trip, Doolittle and his men planned to drop their bombs on Tokyo and several other Japanese cities and make a quick escape toward China, a U.S. ally. American political leaders had tried to hammer out an agreement with Josef Stalin to allow the bombers to land in the Soviet Union after the raid, but the Soviet leader refused, leaving China as the only realistic option.
So, what was the ‘supposed’ role of this gigantic hawk of imperials’ tool originally? Check all the ‘legitimate’ reference bodies of literature, and what you get is what was marketed and sold over six decades ago:
Anwaar: Tradition, how dare you. Society might have been incapable of seeing your wrath but I have not. I will fight you! My sister will live on through me. I will continue her work, and I will break tradition.
Most moms who experience breastfeeding problems can resolve them with time and proper support. I am not one of those moms.
Raine laughed, she couldn’t help it. Even Gavin couldn’t stop the twitch of his lips, while Xander lowered her head as if to hide her face. If Tomás thought threatening to sic Mulcahy on them was going to pull them in line, he was bound for disappointment. Mulcahy was the captain of the Wraiths, and if he hadn’t trusted them to do their job, he wouldn’t have sent them down here in the first place.
“It’s a terrible thing, GB!” wailed Derek. “I’ve been tricked into doing something I didn’t want to…….something against my nature,” he added blushing. “And it’s completely ruined my friendship with Sally. How will I ever be able to face her again? The thought of her gossiping about this with the other girls is simply unbearable.”
02 - Foolish Men
The molded embellishment looked fantastic when I removed it. All I did was place my sticker image into the centre circle. A small pour of Jewelry Resin over the sticker created the clear dome over the bee. I also added some resin to the indents that you can see on this picture.
2) "W. T. GRANT'S VOLUME IV"
Fortunately, third tech was as wonderful as second tech. In five minutes, she talked us through everything, and explained that the Deuce had passed the tone and movement elements again in the short time she'd been there, so that was very encouraging. She said that the baby was taking some breaths but she needed to see it happen for thirty seconds. I was feeling a little calmer then since it wasn't that my baby was incapable of breathing, but just didn't feel like doing it for extended periods of time. She also assured us that it made no difference if the baby passed the BPP in five minutes or thirty minutes. Equally good score and no need to worry either way.
Comfort: N/A
Some people may develop an itch without a rash when they take certain drugs (such as aspirin, codeine, cocaine). Others may develop an itchy, red “drug rash” or hives because of an allergy to a specific drug.
Simplicity would suggest, if you want a job done right, ask a specialist.
1. I began the month by ending last month in the negative numbers…oh…about $300. (This is NOT normal for me…at least not since those first few months after leaving The Evil Ex.)
Painful Realities
We dyed play silks in garden today. Like I mentioned we have always enjoyed playing with silks, yet have until today not dyed them ourselves. We used an "acid" dye, which is good for most animal fibers, and a bit strong so use caution and gloves.
Since this wasn’t the first trip I hope to be better prepared. The dropped requirement for crampons was helping with weight too (there was some weird request to bring bike helmets as a protection during river crossings. Thankfully it was dropped as well). Somehow this time around I’ve managed to fit all my food into the bear box – 12 days of it. I seem to be getting better at (or I will be a lot skinnier at the end).
Please link your X-citing X post now!
WE know Cotter is the Ultimate Fishing Town but here’s your chance to make it nationally known and help Cotter win a $25,000 community donation from the World Fishing Network.
07. He's Scared of His Shadow
Our guide in Petra, who came to us as he was the only non-smoking guide there – who knew every bit about the Nebateans, the tombs, the archways, Al-Khazneh – and we later learned – Mahmoud knew everyone and everyone knew Mahmoud – the prodigal son of the local tribe!!!
Excess weight tends to increase the amount of LDL and triglycerides in the body. If the body gets higher supply of calories than are actually used, then the excess calories get stored as fats (triglycerides) in the cells of the body. Obesity increases the risk of high blood pressure and diabetes that may lead to heart diseases. Overweight people do not have enough amount of HDL in their blood. Weight loss helps in increasing the levels of HDL and reduces the triglycerides in the body.
I have a saying that I started a while ago that gives me hope. “I am as perfect as I can be today.”
before I quickly changed to make a trip to the Post Office.
2) That's like saying perfume lasts only a year. I. don't. buy. it.
How to get this look?
The first thing that sets this watch apart from the Hamilton is obviously the dial. While being significantly busier, it is very well-balanced and doesn’t impede telling what time it is. All pertinent information can easily be read with a quick glance, especially with the white dial and blue hands combination. Under the hood lies a cousin to the ETA 2824 movement, the Valjoux 7750. Designed for chronograph watches such as the Heritage 1954, it features a day and date function at 3 o’clock, a 12-hour counter at 6 o’clock, a small seconds subdial at 9 o’clock and a 30-minute counter at 12 o’clock. It also features telemetric and tachymetric scales, if ever you feel the need to manually determine the speed at which you’re going or at which distance something is using sound, which could be handy in very specific situations – storms and explosions come to mind.
Irrelevant is a word that describes me best. I wish to be free, but I am a prisoner of my own state, a prisoner of my own mind.
Plain and simple or full of might
And so she knew
What this country needs is an identifiable right-of-centre political party. One that is not confused about where it stands on matters of sovereignty, democracy, the size of government, educational elitism, personal responsibility, sentencing and prisons, policing, immigration, the erosion of individual liberty.
I hope you all have an enjoyable experience making your own decadent Doubloon Macaroons, and don’t be afraid to experiment with other flavours, colourings and presentations!
When the band first appeared, they were clad in the attention-grabbing getup of matching golden masks and black jackets. Lead singer Andrew Wyatt presided over his table of effects pedals, which he manipulated to ring in the booming elongated bass line of “Enter the Jokers Lair”. It started off slow, but then bandmates Christian Karlsson and Pontus Winnberg jumped in the mix to add their own bobbing and floating notes that fleshed out the song into a melodic, dynamic piece, complete with floating xylophone solos. Everyone on stage was constantly in motion, toggling new settings on their illuminated center console of knobs, tapping out piano notes, or even strumming thumb piano chords to create beautifully layered songs. A skillful drummer hit out intricate rhythms to keep everything in line, and Karlsson and Winnberg would periodically bang out some beats on the floor tom drums that were scattered about the stage. All of these elements melded together to create the signature Miike Snow sound of catchy rhythm-centric synthesized and layered progressions that kept the audience dancing through the entire set.
Planted some Snowball turnips last weekend and they too are looking good with no sign of Flea Beatle - probably given them the kiss of death now!
With the Pussycats,
Through the 2009 season both McLaren drivers had a safe and reliable KERS at each race. The system was safe even after crashes and was fault free despite rain soaked races. Safety was designed in from the outset, all electrics were double insulated. Teams can also measure damage to the unit via accelerometers and insulation sensors, so any impact or incidental damage can be monitored and the car retired if the need arises. Additionally each cell in the battery has its temperature monitored. KERS batteries are sensitive to high and low temperatures, each cell needing to operate in a specific thermal window. Too low and the unit is inefficient and too hot and there’s the danger of explosion.
Maybe to my husband for his unparalleled efforts to finding solutions for his torque problems
I cried. Alot. It was the sweetest mixture of sad and hopeful I've ever met on a page.
Withania somnifera and Bauhinia purpurea in the regulation of circulating thyroid hormone concentrations in female mice.
His critique of the passive voice as a supposed "stylistic problem," however, is first-order bad science — perhaps not quite on the order of homeopathy, but still utterly unfounded. If you, like Goldacre, think that "passive voice should be avoided," then you should read some good science by Geoffrey Pullum from Language Log: "The Passive in English." I hope that Goldacre, too, will follow my tip and recognize the Language Log linguists as his fellow campaigners against "bad science."
After Badlands it was onward to Mount Rushmore! I also visited here last year on my way out to Oregon. Even though the 4 faces are the same, it was a definitely a different experience. Julie and I decided to hike the Presidential Trail and caught the second half of a ranger walk/talk. It was very cool and I learned even more about the 4 presidents (Washington, Jefferson, T. Roosevelt, & Lincoln).
Also, I've tried to finish my pictures up a little more, I don't know if that makes it too busy or what. And I realize the font there might not be all that readable. I have to find a font I like. All in due time.
You're in between 20 and 30
We'd love to see all your yummy lacey stuff peeps!
Yes it’s me again. I can’t help it. I have to write. What about, I don’t know. Something or other. I’ve done a lot of writing today. Also did a lot of laundry and some other chores and helped my mother do some shopping and did look for some jobs but without much luck. However, I am not giving up. Someday I’m going to get out of this situation I’m in. Someday I will get myself out of this. Somehow. I’m working on it.
Reduce heat to medium-low, then simmer until mixture is reduced by half (the recipe says this takes about 5 or 6 minutes, but I find it takes longer than that). Transfer to a medium box and allow to cool.
4. I have been watching quilt shows on line. I love to make scrap quilts.
Is Your grasp
Her breaths echo in my dark cell. Is she real? She fills my
The image is by Natalie Shau, you can find her work on DevianArt, I just love this image. I have mat and layered her onto red and black cardstock and used flourish dies and a sentiment plaque by Tim Holtz. The skull in the left corner is a digi stamp by Smeared Ink, decoupaged and covered in glossy accent, then mounted onto a cameo surround. The skull in the right corner is from a necklace I bought somewhere in a sale. The flowers, ribbon and lace are all from my stash
Passengers Miss Sarajevo I/IRL
Animals are strikingly similar to humans in their mannerisms. I’m not saying that cats are our equals intellectually, but I would be willing to defend that they hold their own socially.
Time: Sunday 20th November 21.00 BST (20.00 GMT, 15.00 EST, 14.00 CST etc)
I hammered away at the resident until she agreed to give him a cough suppressant. She reluctantly agreed despite her argument that cough suppressants haven’t been proven to work. Her alternative suggestion was to have him sip warm tea. It was midnight. What a perfect time to run out for some hot tea. She also said Luke needed to be on Augmentin for ten days, and then wrote a prescription for five days worth. “Thanks, genius. Here’s another bucket of cash. Stay in school and learn how to count.”
“Good evening! I’m in Saitama.(North to Tokyo) I got soaked up in the rain twice yesterday,I couldn’t help it.
Why Can't We Live Together - Sade (Timmy Thomas)
Also using arrays of pressure taps is another common aero testing tool made public by McLaren last year. Again this year McLaren have used these tools in recent tests, the flow-vis being tried several times and the pressure taps early one morning in last weeks tests.
So this took me back to my genetic history as a starting point in seeking to answer the "Why me?" question.
You're still making some fundamental mistakes (like mentioning this is based on events you've seen). And we're back to the first title? Does that make it 0-5 or does it only count as one strike if you use the same one again.
I’m bugged even more today because the sun is out and I have the day off, I should be out with my camera but instead I’m sat in watching DVD’s waiting for the deliveryman. Yesterday was like a monsoon, no parcels to wait for but no chance of any photography! I went to pizza hut instead, grabbed a pizza and coke and sat and people watched for a couple of hours with a couple of magazines for company.
I have spoken to COOEE Bus Drive coordinator Bob Jones and he has confirmed that two of the buses that were booked to go - the one from Coffs Harbour and the one from Qirindi have been cancelled due to RTA (Road Transport Authority)harassment.
The final touch was to attach the skull using Pinflair glue to maintain its curved shape, and to paint the border in black and white acrylic paints.
Personalities like Allen Ginsberg and George Harrison kept popping up in the popular media, and their association with Srila Prabhupada’s movement created important visibility for the Hare Krsna explosion. The devotees also gained attention by showing up at counterculture events, peace gatherings, be-in’s, and musical events that showcased personalities who are now famously associated with that era. Even Muhammad Ali shared the spotlight with Srila Prabhupada, at an anti-war peace concert Ali organized.
Over the years, I've searched the internet for great songs about butterflies that my students could act out or move to in some way. My favorite songs are:
Another busy day at the Harty Household... I heard the kids at about 7:30am, but ignored them, and went back to sleep. Hehehe. I woke up at around 8:30am, and went out to see what they all were doing. I turned on Saturday morning cartoons for them, ate some breakfast, and at 9am, went to wake up Captain America.
I don’t know about my readers, but I have a hard time finding clothing that fits me right and looks good. I have recently gained a lot of weight and find myself having a hard time finding pretty plus size clothing. Then, I discovered Alight! Alight carries clothing for women in sizes 14-30! That means great clothes for plus size women!
I checked my email before we left the house, updated my facebook status.
At mid tide, the waves break at just the right spot for surfing. On a high tide, the waves build and build and then dump hard on the beach, making surfing almost impossible.
Because I have a marvellous thing to say,
Now, you may be thinking that I am doing my kids a disservice by not at least turning these types of incidents into "teachable moments." Why not, for example, use a broken window as a way to teach my children about how glass is made and windows repaired? Why not use a nuked fork to teach them about electricity? Why not use the Therasol incident to teach them about ratios and concentrates? Those are reasonable questions. For me, though, the answer is simple. When my kids make mistakes, big or small, they DO learn - they just learn, in the main, without having to be taught. Certainly, I could teach them about glass, electricity, or the properties of a brick that makes it scratch metal. But instead of imparting the wisdom of my experience and making their every mistake into a teachable moment, I look upon their mistakes as an opportunity to learn, without expectation or condition. By approaching these situations peacefully and without my teacher hat on, they learn - all by themselves - that it is okay to make mistakes, that they will be loved unconditionally without having to be "taught" a lesson of any kind, and that their needs and feelings are respected, always and in all ways.
Diddy Kong Antagonism Nintendo DS
* When your boxer shorts have deer on them
DEAR BENNY: Every other year, I review and shop for homeowners insurance about three months before my anniversary date, which is Nov. 1. However, my lender has taken to paying whatever company I have two months early. Nobody can explain why.
It's Bob Dylan's 70th Birthday next week.Out of respect for His Bobness, here is a video I took in Hebden Bridge at the recent anti-royalist street party.A band (i know not who) sing the opening riffs of 'All Along The Watchtower.''
Yup. When I twisted the pad tight, the tightness was the pad being wedged against the rear wheel. It wouldn't turn with mild pressure. I had to give it some muscle to even get it to spin at all.
Schumpeter warns that this is a great simplification: "Of course, we do not, as a matter of principle, postulate either internal regularity or sine form...
Red-handed, you caught her leaving again
She claims that the "War on Drugs" disproportionately targets young men of color, blah blah blah.
April is the time to get ready for the hot temperatures in the Phoenix Arizona. Many plants are blooming and growing. Taking care of your garden now before the hot temperatures arrive will allow for your garden to make it through the hot summer with beauty and minimal landscape loss.
“Cathedrals are incredible testaments to human endeavour. It is not only their grandeur or splendour, but the thought that they often took more than fifty years to build. Those who designed them, those who first worked on them, knew for certain that they would never see them finished. They knew only that they were creating something glorious which would stand for centuries, long after their own names had been forgotten…..
Peter took a sip from his drink. “Yes, Dad, I am,” he muttered. His cell phone rang. It was a henchman calling. A very important henchman with very important connections. Connections who put a lot of money into Frauen Pharmaceuticals and Peter’s back pocket.
“Good. Send a representative immediately. We need to make contact with these men as soon as possible.”
And doesn't it look GRAND?
You’ll see my heart
Yesterday evening I saw this fox in the garden.This is the first fox I have managed to photograph,though I have seen them in the field behind our garden,this is the first one to venture into the garden.I believe this is a young one and appears to be in the process of getting it's winter coat, after exploring the garden he came right up to the shed just a few feet from my window.These shots were taken through the window as I knew if I had opened the door he/she, would have run off.
Huang, P. 2002. “Development or Involution in Eighteenth Century Britain and China: A Review of Kenneth Pomeranz’s The Great Divergence,” The Journal of Asian Studies 61 (2): 501-538.
Heather Joy runs Grow Up! Where she posts regularly through the gifts of writing and video logs! As you can see from this post she is willing to be open, honest and vulnerable. Which we could all learn from! If you enjoy this post then I highly recommend you clicking the link to go and read more!
I still have a book from when I was a boy called "Underwater Adventure" by Willard Price.
Will you be ready?
I gained back some weight in 2007-2009 as I had my girls in that time period, and I was back to where I started when I moved from Miami. FRUSTRATING! Right? Well, yes. I had to get to a point where I was so tired of everything - being fat, being tired, mood swings, I had to get mad. Really mad. I was sick of the excuses I made, I was sick of the greasy gross garbage I put in my mouth on a daily basis, and I really didn't want my kids to eat that. So, I did some research.
These are the changes that we can control.
my daughter and I share them!
…people from black or minority ethnic communities suffered 49,000 violent attacks, with 4,000 being wounded. The number of violent attacks against whites reached 77,000, while the number of white people who reported being wounded was five times the number of black and minority ethnic victims at 20,000.
It also makes it easier to write and direct my own book trailers:
I'm so superficial!
you've seen them again from above, them
So, this band called Foo Fighters are out here playing a bunch of stadium shows and as well as having Tenacious D support them they decide to ask Fucked Up to come out and open shows for them. A strange choice I think but one that I was happy with because I loved the idea of seeing them again: even if it was a 20 minute opening slot. However, rumours went around of a sideshow at the East Brunswick Club and I held out on getting a ticket to the Foo Fighters show. The rumours came true and they did do a sideshow and boy, what a show it was. Supports for the evening came from The Smith Street Band who were pretty fantastic. I got there with only a handful of songs left so I didn't get a chance to record them. I think they are opening for someone I'm seeing soon anyway so I'll be sure to catch them then.
The Shopper's Hymn ...........................Sweet Bye and Bye
I finally saw the movie Dark Passage last week, being on my to-watch list for a while. Filmed in many locations in San Francisco, including Market Street, Telegraph Hill and Fort Point, I think it's the best pairing of Bogart and real-life love (and wife) Lauren Bacall, even though the movie did not do well at the box office. But it's a true noir, with all the requisite twists and dark characters, except that this movie has a happy ending.
The figure on the bank made a sharp, downward gesture with its hands and jogged off towards the car.
My village
Sometimes I get over-excited when it is really late and I have spent all evening hunched over a board with cold feet and a paintbrush in hand. It's not my fault and I shouldn't be blamed.
It would appear that a revised final payment deadline for the pitch was approaching, and meantime BrewDog and GBBF organisers, led by Marc 'Goliath' Holmes, were still negotiating over the size of containers and the dispense. The BrewDog blog has the full chronology set out by James, while the comments contain responses to some of the points by Marc Holmes.
1-0
Usually, when I decide to review a book, I’ll read it through twice, just to make sure I give it a fair shake. Except for Android Karenina, that is, but that book was just too long to read twice, come up with witty things to say about it, and try to make a video. But as soon as I finished this book, I started reading it again out of sheer pleasure. Usually, I wait a while between repeating books I read for fun. Not so here. And the best part is that it didn’t feel like a repeat experience. Both times the book was fresh and enjoyable to read.
Sever LE. Congenital malformations related to occupational reproductive hazards. Occup Med: State Art Rev 1994; 9: 471-494.
Somehow there’s no time.
I once saw a press release for a new paranormal series which read 'All the cool kids in town are dead'. That's obviously just silly, and most teen readers recognise that. But sometimes the subliminal messages in teen books are surprisingly un-life-affirming, and sometimes the messages about bereavement are almost undermining.
When someone, like John Smid, announces a change of heart and seeks to make amends, (after overseeing a residential program that brought misery and confusion to hundreds if not thousands,) I believe that reconciliation with the community he harmed is a process that needs to be conducted thoughtfully and sensitively. If a family member has abused others and then repents, it is complex and difficult work to bring that person back into family life and gatherings. Not impossible, but I believe we must not overlook history or the gravity of offenses committed.
A couple weeks since my last attempt at Pumpkin Pie, I knew I was ready to try again; but this time, I wanted to keep it simple. Although I enjoyed the flavors of the ginger and ceylon tea, I decided to cut back on the spices in this recipe to allow the pumpkin flavor to shine. I can see an advertisement for this pie reading:
Location 3, Clientele 4, Beer Selection 3, Ambience 4, Service 4.5
GIVE-AWAY coming SOOOOOON! - stay posted!!!!!
So thats it for now. X-rated astronomers and gravy fans have a year to gird their loins. Who wants to open a book ?
here in Mauritius, we are firstly a multicultural island where we grow learning to live with so many ethnical and cultural differences...
I am in complete awe of my life. I am in complete awe of my loving Father in Heaven. I went through something very difficult recently and in the midst of everything I was overwhelmed with shame, with regrets, with bitterness, with sadness, with loss, with physical and emotional pain, and with so many more emotions. I am not trying to be dramatic-this is just the raw truth. And yet in all the chaos of the moment, an internal peace centered within my core. I didn't reach out to others the way I have before-I didn't look for people to console me or to 'take my side'. Instead, I told a minimal amount of people and fell to my knees.
Finningley
Local film screening venues have been capitalizing on the silent film/Oscar resonances all Winter, and the reverberations continue throughout March and into the coming months as well. The Niles Essanay Silent Film Museum includes Méliès films in three of its five Saturday night screening programs this month, including a hand-colored print of his Palace of the Arabian Nights March 31st. The Balboa Theatre also grabs a hold of Hugo this Sunday when it celebrates its 86th birthday. The tradition of showing a silent film during their annual bash continues, this year with a 35mm print of Harold Lloyd in Safety Last, the film from which comes the iconic image of a bespectacled wall-crawler hanging off a giant department store clock. Hugo presents this image prominently as well, when its main characters attend a film screening (although in the original book they attend the Rene Clair film Le Million.) Past Balboa birthday parties (I've attended three over the years) have been some of the best value-for-ticket-dollar experiences I've had on Frisco Bay. Not only is there a feature film with live musical accompaniment, but also other live entertainment, cake, door prizes and the opportunity for trivia prizes as well. Last year I made quite a haul, and would've even if I hadn't known my Charlie Chaplin trivia.
a cry
as her once strong father gazed at her with the eyes of a scared child......
I've been a busy bee with things like cleaning and sorting. I even made my own laundry detergent using the Duggar's recipe only it congealed too much to pour into other containers, so I did some math and we're using it right out of the bucket. It's working well and I think it will save us a lot of money. I've also been working with the dog so she doesn't pull so much whilst I'm walking her. We've been getting our exercise anyway lol.
It looked something like this:
The whole nose-to-tail philosophy is something I really do feel strongly about. Eating meat is a luxury that comes with responsibilities. Sustainability, humane treatment of animals, minimising environmental impact and using our natural resources efficiently are all issues that should be considered with every food choice we make.
I'm sure there are more, but this has turned into a crazy-long description of things that are probably only interesting to me, so we'll just end here with a question: What's making you happy lately, duckies?
~ Ian
I am pretty sure that Jimmy can sense our feelings about him. When I first became aware of his dishonesty in February, it changed my relationship with him forever. Since then, the lies haven’t stopped and my distrust of him has grown. It is now to the point where I barely speak to him unless I am correcting something or he is asking me a direct question. I have lost all respect for him in proportion to the lack of respect he has for us. The more he lies, the more disrespect I feel he shows us; the more he shows disrespect for us (the only people who have ever helped him in his life), the more respect I lose for him.
7 – 8 p.m.– Opening Reception and Welcome
I tried a flea market at Ajinomoto stadium on this sunday!
Your respectful petitioner
Acehnese food has more influenced from Southern Indian food compare to other regions in Indonesia. There is one ingredient here that is speciality to Aceh dishes, asam sunti. By giving the name asam, it means sour and made from dried bilimbi. If you don’t have any asam sunti, just add more bilimbi (Averrhoa bilimbi or kamias in Tagalog).
Since I moved to Hong Kong last year and started blogging about living in this crazy and hectic city (see some posts here and here), I have been inundated with emails from bloggers and readers of blogs, looking for a fashion insiders guide to Hong Kong. I absolutely love getting emails from you all and even more I love helping you tailor your trip, so I thought it was high time I wrote a guide to Hong Kong from a bloggers perspective. I know how much I sometimes struggle to find the perfect To Do list when visiting a new city. So here’s mine! Everyone’s taste is different, but I hope this will help you when you come to the city. If you want any more specific information feel free to email me.
It is interesting how often the subject of eugenics pops up in movies, from Gregory Peck's snarling Meggele creating various teenaged Hitler clones, all suitably obnoxious and played by the subsequently unemployable Jeremy Black, in the 1978 movie “The Boys from Brazil” to the futuristic designer babies of “Gattaca”.
So how can you write picture books if you don’t illustrate? The simple answer is that you must think visually. For example, don’t include excessive descriptive detail in a story because this will be seen in the illustration. Think how words and images could work together to produce something that isn’t simply an illustrated story. Plus there must be opportunities for varied illustrations throughout the book.
Lilith accompanies these women disguised as a mischievous crow who befriends them and helps guide them on the right paths. The dangers are formidable, and eventually Lilith must decide if she will let her friend die and the errand fail, or sacrifice her own immortality so that one of these descendants of her hated rival might reach the Garden and save the life of her friend.
The Cardiovascular Health Study conducted between 1996 and 2006, looked at many different factors related to heart disease.
The Andaz was nicknamed The Riot House due to the British invasion of The Who, The Rolling Stones and Led Zeppelin’s wild times during their stays. Keith Richards, John Bonham and Keith Moon have each thrown a television out an Andaz window.
The 3M Company (NYSE: MMM), formerly known as the Minnesota Mining and Manufacturing Company, is an American multinational conglomerate corporation based in Maplewood, Minnesota, United States.
“As I learned more about the media conditions in China, I began to doubt whether it is easy to be a good journalist. There are various restrictions on media reports. There are also threats which would affect the journalist’s integrity. Also, journalism may be the most toilsome occupation with relatively low income. But I know there is no easy job in the world. I still think the job of a journalist is so meaningful that it is worth my devotion.”
If I had to pick one, contingent upon Dalton feeling better, I'd go with Cincinnati upsetting the Texans.
so I decided to go with my own version.
"Still five and a half weeks, Oat."
All these said sooths have come to pass, and I could list – very easily – another twenty no-brainers that this and thousands of other sites predicted after 2008: bank lessons not learned, EU smugness, Murdoch lies, Greek default, Credit swap obligations, banks v citizens, Lansley’s NHS proposals, mutuality in the socio-economic mix…on and on and on the issues go.
Whew! That’s a lot to think about!
Smoky, deconstructed sentences, a multiverse of language
January 31, 2005
So, a few things. One, I’ve decided Saturday is my day. My day to update my blog, that is. Though I’m not one to lament every time I find myself off the grid, or not connected, I feel this urge as of late to at least be more communicative.. Therefore, I’ve figured that on Saturdays (Chch time, so late Friday for the rest of y’all), I’ll always put up a new post that at least mentions the single most interesting thing of my week….even if it doesn’t happen to be all that interesting. I think it’ll be a good idea because not only will it force me to be in touch a bit more, but it’ll also prove to be a nice way to convey a little bit of what my life’s like here in Chch. Plus, and I think this is the biggest thing for me, is that this new resolution forces me to keep my eyes and ears open for stuff that goes on during the week; it pushes me to not go through my remaining time here stuck in a routine, otherwise oblivious to life going on around me. I open to suggestions, by the way, as to whether is this is or isn’t a good idea, or what any of you want to know about. Is there something specific about Chch that you’re curious about? Let me know, I’ll write about it. After all, this blog is for you as much as it is for me.
Who knows...
Once Dustin and I did get back together, everyone pushed the fact that we should be joining the ranks and getting married. We got back together because we were all each other knew by that point. While we used the break up to provide us with a chance to pretend our problems didn’t exist, it didn’t work. I believe we truly loved each other at this point. It may not haev been perfect but we did have love.
Her lips a sweet surprise
A BIT OF THE LEGALESE
Brian Matusz had a solid outing only surrendering one run on a Curtis Granderson solo shot in the 1st inning. He rebounded and gave up only four more hits while striking out four in 6.1 IP; Brian enjoyed his first victory since June 6, 2011.
Schumer: no I didn’t
2) Describe how God brought this person to faith in Jesus Christ. What events and people did God use to humble this person and bring him/her to the Savior?
Lo!
If you would like to read our project proposal or gain more information please don’t hesitate to contact us on ricketybridge@live.co.uk
What do the disciples finally realize about Jesus?
(Click the image to spanify.)
down on a seat across from Suzy
Ok, I am done now--I feel a little bit better getting that off my chest.
It’s easy to boil this down to something like “Get help,” or “Raise awareness of mental illness,” or “Get therapy and/or psychiatric medicine,” or “Hang in there for your family and friends.” But it’s not so easy to know those things when you’re in the middle of any one of the bad things that happen to people every day. Some people have more to deal with in life than others and some people take things harder than others do. But I’ve always believed that what’s good about life outweighs what’s bad, and it breaks my heart that so many people can’t see that.
Discovering which Technical services are provided by the venue and which ones you may need to source externally can be a time consuming process, so we put together this handy guide to get you started:
I wouldn't be involved with comics in any way without 2000AD .
Yams are tubers of a tropical vine called Dioscorea batatas and are not even related to the sweet potato. Depending on the variety, yams have brown or black skin with off-white, purple or red flesh. They are more easily found in international than American markets. Yams are actually sweeter than sweet potatoes as they have more natural sugar. However, sweet potatoes are more nutritious and are loaded with calcium, potassium, and vitamins A and C.
don't you love the burlap seats and the wildflowers in jars on the tables? pretty awesome vibe here.
For three years, we have wondered what the bizarre squeaking and yowling and chirping and trilling coming from this quirky little animal was. He does it at various times of the night and his favorite place to do it from is the little ledge on the eyebrow window thingy 9 feet off the ground. After these noisy sessions, he has high anxiety and will flop down on my neck with his little heart rate elevated and breathing heavily.
Having looked at the technical end, it's time to move on to the technique part of this missive. Here, I feel the need to repeat something. Carteach is not a tactical trainer, nor is he some form of expert on this topic. He's just some guy trying to decipher the mysteries on his own, and taking his friends along on a virtual buggy ride while he does it. If someone tries to play Rambo by practicing my meandering thoughts and gets his butt lit up, that's all home grown stupid.... don't try shipping it over this way. We have enough of our own.
We re-furbished the kitchen, got rid of everything that was malevolent, installed new built-in cabinets, another new oven, new hobs, a new sink, and practically new everything!
9. Drive smart. Choose a fuel-efficient car. Find out what your most fuel-efficient speed is and stick to that on highways. Aggressive driving habits like speeding, rapid acceleration, and hard breaking waste gas. If you can, load things in the trunk and not on the roof rack. A roof rack creates drag and slows you down. Take the time to clean out your car. The junk in your back seat or trunk means extra weight, and extra weight means wasted fuel.
By late August my Galena hop vine was ripe for the pickin'. My little hop garden, now cut to the ground for Fall/Winter was by no means a huge producer. The Cascades yielded some cones but not enough to do anything with besides pick and smell/marvel at. By far my best producing vine was the Galena vine which sprouted dozens of large plump green nuggets. But still, after picked and dried I only had a half ounce of Galena hops. I needed a recipe where high alpha American aroma hops could shine. Given the onslaught of fall and the characteristics of my home grown hops, I went with an American Amber Ale.
anything is better
Weekday sessions to choose from:
Sirius to Shambhala is a journey of time-moldavite-yemaz-tektite
Sweet tarts!
Indeed not only did McCombes willingly hide this “hypocrisy” from other members of his party as well as the SSP voters in the Scottish election of 2003, but he was happy to do so in such a way that his relationship with Sheridan was never strained. This is difficult to believe.
31. Describe your personal fashion concept in 2009?
“The conditions of war generates different dynamics, which we can still see today in Afghanistan and Iraq where there are many vendetta killings and economic killings done under falsified circumstances.”
Dee Jackson is our challenge host this week. Dee is challenging us to watercoloring. You can use any medium for watercoloring that you like and any theme you want. Pretty simple and straight forward. Looking forward to seeing what you create with the watercolor challenge!
For me with my entire family,
The beer taps reflected this. Of the 20 taps, not one pulled a beer brewed in Durango or a macro-brewed lager. It wasn't out of spite; Ward simply wanted his pub to be something different. The beers were almost exclusively imports like Guinness, Harp, Murphy's Stout and several Paulaner taps. It was a place you might find a couple of good German pilseners on tap.
Censored Video: Alex Jones joins the New World Order! (Satire) US Debt Threatens The World Financial System! S&P Outlook Downgrade! Max Keiser: No Fraud No Economy! Max’s Transcendental Gold Experience! Bob Chapman: QE3 Is An Absolute Certainty! UNICEF: Gaza Children Stressed, Desperate And in Danger! Nabi Saleh: A Tiny Village’s Struggle Against Zionist ’666′ Israel’s Occupation! Beware of the Great Silver Correction! Dan Norcini: US Dollar Very Close To An Accelerating Decline! Bix Weir: 20 Reason to Sell (Buy!! Buy!! Buy!!) Your Silver!
And until, at last perfected, we bear witness
Me: Boys, it is not morning yet. You are up FAR too early. Everyone else is trying to sleep still. It is time to be quiet now with no.more.talking, do you understand?
You aren't able to post comments on the articles, but I stumbled across a blog post by the author (in French), and there are most certainly comments there! And they're basically what you see every time unschooling gets some new publicity, minus all the positive comments by unschoolers jumping in to tell people how wrong they are (there just aren't enough unschoolers in Montreal). And no, I didn't look at the comments to aggravate myself (though I must admit it does feel weird to have such venom directed specifically at us. It doesn't bother me as much as I thought it would, but it is weird...). I looked at the comments because I was curious if the reactions would be different than what I've seen in the past, since Quebec itself is pretty different from the rest of North America. For the most part, the reactions are the same, though there is a much stronger current of "these people will always be on the margins of society and will also be, *gasp*, RADICAL!" Evidenced by the fact I'm a radical anarchist hippie, because obviously one unschooler represents all unschoolers...
It might not be what you want to hear, but it’s another school life story. It’s not about collecting mischievous characters, but instead everyone is like an esper. But in that school, there is one person who is powerless. Of course he has to be our protagonist. Why is he there? That’s the main purpose of the story. The title is Escape from the School! Please read it.
crossed into the Sanctum
Quote of the day: "We must fall back upon the old axiom that when all other contingencies fail, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth." - Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, The Adventure of the Bruce-Partington Plans﻿
In order to rouse his newly assigned group of men from their first defeat in North Africa (he's replacing an ineffectual general who let the boys get slaughtered), Patton initially presents himself as a maniac for discipline and army regulation, making his men fear and hate him; but the toughness makes them better soldiers as a result, and when they measure up, his admiration becomes enough of a reward that they're ready to die for him. As Cesar "The Dog Whisperer" Milan would say, he is an excellent pack leader, radiating calm, assertive energy and understanding that all affection must be earned for it to have value. Or as Tura Satana said in FASTER PUSSYCAT, KILL KILL: "You don't have to believe it, just act it." Patton doesn't mind that your hands shake so long as you're trying to keep them steady. It's only when you cower that he boots you into the deep end like a sadistic but wise pool instructor (my own most hated-feared childhood figure).
CUPCAKES!?! IN A SCHOOL!?!
Then, I saw how much blood there was, and, upon rinsing in the sink, I saw the extent of the injury, and the metal dust that was in there.
across the inky stillness
Here is the first picture of me that we posted!
Christmas morning, I say once again.
In 't hus van me voader op de zolder vergeten
I apply for my first job in fourth grade by filling out a form in the back of a comic book. There, next to advertisements for x-ray specs and garlic chewing gum is the opportunity to earn extra money I've been looking for: door-to-door sales. Candles, greeting cards, little porcelain salt and pepper figurines of angels, windmills, and mushrooms. Who wouldn't want to buy these things?
We Sarawakians have a right – and a duty – to cast our votes in free and fair elections.
I have been blessed to work with many amazing folks, and at Oakland Baptist Church I’ve been doubly blessed. There are so many wonderfully talented folks who selflessly share their gifts each and every Sunday.
Well, I guess that's it for now. Hope everyone has a great week!
I haven’t seen Janis and her wife, Dina, since sometime before Kevin died. Over the years we’ve communicated through emails and on rare occasions, via phone calls, but we haven’t physically been in the same place together since around the time of Kevin’s passing. They were actually his friends before they were mine; they were two of the few people he was willing to come out to back then, and because I was a part of his life then, he introduced me to them. We’ve always liked each other, a great deal.
To Deepak, the key to everything is the understanding of consciousness. It is true that science has only begun to address that question. How do those unthinking atoms we are made of conspire to create love, pain, and joy? How does the brain create thought and conscious experience? The brain contains more than a hundred billion neurons, roughly the number of stars in a galaxy, but the stars hardly interact, while the average neuron is plugged into thousands of others. That makes the human brain far more complex and difficult to fathom than the universe of galaxies and stars and is one reason we have made great leaps in our understanding of the cosmos, while knowledge of ourselves proceeds at a relative crawl. Is that a sign that our minds cannot be explained?
I personally follow a Paleo lifestyle, avoiding gluten, grains, soy and most dairy. On my site I always try to be mindful of the wide range of personalities, diets and needs out there. All of my recipes are labeled appropriately and I always try to offer substitutions and ideas for those who need to avoid nuts, eggs, and other allergens.
So, I did what any organized obsessed gal would do. I drew a diagram of how I wanted the inside of our fridge to function! And then I decided to make it pretty by giving you a diagram I whipped up on the computer....
I have a habit of giving books as gifts, especially to my nephews and niece. I was just talking to my sister about what my oldest nephew might want and she suggested his first Hardy Boys. So I went and looked it up and then I started to remember the books I read at his age.
Serbia points out that it can't afford a whole suit, but offers to pay for cleaning Austria's trousers.
MAC Mineralize Skinfinish Natural in Light-Medium
19 Apollo Manchester, England
Any community radio station operating with a community radio lisence- so not an RSL! These stations must be not for profit, and be actively seeking to involve their target communities in their work.
"I do not choose to argue a point which cannot be proved, but which is tacitly agreed upon. I will continue."
Hungarian Scarf, from objetapetita. I just love these colors--like Saffron and Paprika. Very Hungarian indeed. Also, I particularly like browsing objetapetita's store, because she has a little story vignette with every item. It's so lovely!
It was snowing as I looked out of my bedroom window yesterday morning, followed by rain. The rain hasn´t stopped yet… Rain… utter rain this day has to offer me, so it seems. Looks like the weather forecast got it right after all. When I least hope it would.
The fact of the matter is, I'm not going to drive like an idiot......anymore. Sure, I admit I used to, but I also used to go to bed at seven in the morning because I had been up all night partying at a club. Life is different now. I've got two extremely important pieces of cargo in the back seat who are worth more than any of Tutankhamen's priceless artifacts are worth. They're worth more than the Universe is infinite and if it takes me an extra five minutes to get down the road, then so be it.
Since things can be hustly and bustly, I thought I’d ask the staff to share what they do for their “quiet times” with the Lord–those devotional moments where we focus our minds and hearts, looking inward and outward for God’s presence. As I expected, these devotional styles are as varied as the staff’s personalities:
$30 billion will have zero impact on small business
Doug has been working his hiney off.
I realized Presley’s death was undeniably tragic, but I also remember thinking, “Well, 42 is pretty old.”
For the same price. So yes, this weekend I brought home my second:
Using old craft scissors to cut through garland wires, cut off mid-sized clumps and randomly glue them on. Be sure to keep the edges flush so the letter is clear from a distance. Layer to create a cohesive look. Don't worry about the glue - it dries clear. Sturdy berries are key.
ray—which includes, of course, the Delray GreenMarket! Pick up your copy at the market this weekend, or at other local hangouts including many downtown coffee shops, and public facilities such as City Hall, the Chamber of Commerce, and the Delray Public Library.
So stay tuned, if you'd like. You will find, despite the cheap shock effect of the stripper abusing John Mackey, that this is at heart a story of redemption. When viewed through the proper filter, you might even find it is the story of my redemption, buried in metaphor. I hope you'll enjoy the ride. But either way, I'm going to ride it to the end.
—June 29, 2006
The legal regime on the Nile is in theory governed by rules and norms of international law on the sharing of international waters that emerged during the twentieth century, partly in response to the untenable “Harmon Doctrine.” Until the middle of the nineteenth century this doctrine had inferred absolute sovereignty of the state over its territory, and by extensions, a freedom to do what it wished with waters flowing in international rivers through that territory. Subsequently both the Helsinki Rules of 1966 and the ILC rules brought in concepts of cooperation, equitable distribution of waters, due consultation over proposed projects, and adequate compensation. By the latter part of the twentieth century the International Convention on the Non- Navigational Uses International WaterCourses (UN) brought in a substantial body of international law that included principles on sharing benefits, as well as waters. To date the Convention has not been ratified by any Nile riparian state.
Keep this covered( preferably with wet cloth) for about 20 to 30 minutes.
At the grocery store, I saw these huge honey crisp apples, which is what they are selling back home. They were on sale for .99 a pound. I just about did a happy dance right there in the store. The strangest things amuse me to no end.
Sleep? Bleeeehhh... between hiccups, tons of nudging and sharp elbows and knees and the whole peeing every couple hours. It's the best it's gonna be.
It’s elderly Lillian’s first visit with Raine that reveals Sparrow Road’s past. The old woman’s questions about other children don’t make sense to Raine, nor do her references to the mansion as home. It takes a tour from a big, friendly, laughing artist named Diego to make Lillian’s stories clear. Sparrow Road was an orphanage. Their toys, colors and forgotten things still clutter the attic. Now Raine has two mysteries to solve–the orphans’ past and her mother’s decision to move to the retreat for the summer.
$3.00/quart on the stand, or if you order up to four quarts.
I don’t specifically do anything but everyone says “beautiful legs” so lately, I’ve been attentive to them (laughs). Although I say that, when it gets puffy (swollen), I stick a cling sheet around it. I bought it at Don Quixote (laughs).
All the links for the Design Teams blogs are in the sidebar so please go and have a look and leave them some love. :o)
It was ok.
If there’s any interest in compiling a list of terms like this, I’d like it to be a collaborative effort with you guys. Anything you come up with that’s added to the GTP dictionary will be given proper attribution, of course. I’ll set up a permanent page for them that will be easy to access and link.
For it might seem unworthy
Easy, cheap and yummy. doesnt get much better than that!
Douglas has worked on over 5,000 cases. Of those 5,000 cases, he’s never been proved wrong on the guilt or innocence of a suspect. Not once. “I think that’s probably the biggest pressure, is the possibility of being wrong and why I got sick”, Douglas tells me.
The Russians, however, have decided to lay their cards on the table. Their Defense Minister and the Chief of their General Staff went public with a rather bald threat: Build these installations, and at the first sign of a crisis between Russia and the West, they'll take those installations the fuck out. Which means bombing Poland, which will piss off the Poles (although they should be used to the idea).
Caroline was shown by George and Diane the squalid living conditions of tenants in the hostel on the seafront.
Dra gon ya
Even though technology makes leaps and bounds every day, the human heart and soul remains unchanged. We need one another. We need to love and be loved. And we are connected spiritually even if we’re not always connected physically or electronically. Don’t get me wrong – I love the Internet, e-mail, Wi-Fi, and all the other stuff that I don’t really understand the workings of (and don’t want to) but that I use daily. After all, I’m even able to post my blog and reach my friends, family and followers almost magically.
“I’ve been trying to figure out how to explain to our dogs that they can stop pacing the door, waiting for Joseph to return again. They jump every time they hear his car alarm. I miss him every day and he will never be forgotten.”
Level 19: 38% chance to deal 145% damage after an attack.
Honorable Mention: Super 8 – From a sentimental perspective, this might be my favorite film of the year. It took me back to watching Spielberg movies like E.T. or Jaws back when I was a young child in the late 1980s and early 1990s. There were kids who seemed like real kids instead of annoying precocious movie kids. There was a real danger. There was also a profound message about coping with loss and pain. I liked this movie a lot, and while I couldn’t quite put it in my Top Ten I had to give it a shout-out.
(The above image is a detail from Peter Bruegel's horrific masterpiece, THE TRIUMPH OF DEATH. It charts the advance of Death upon Man in general terms, though because it takes a distinctly medieval perspective, it is often depicted as an illustration of the Black Death).
I'm finishing up the last bits for my installation which is going up on tuesday. But I also took the time to make a new day-planner for myself this weekend.
John Sentamu, the Archbishop of York is trying to reduce racism in the Anglican Church.
So while I probably should be packing, I've been going for runs and walks and making soup and braised ribs and taking afternoon naps.
Volcano Type: Stratovolcano
I used a lot of the images that re-occur in most of my work; birds, tree, eyes, eggs. I got curious about those symbols after I posted a while back about their recurrence. It turns out they are all considered symbols of the soul, or mystical knowledge. The trees and eggs as well can also symbolize re-birth or growth. So, evidently my sub-conscious is slightly obsessed with itself.
“believers”; of Muslims burning schools for girls; of Muslims stoning
"Soon, I'll move to an old age home and, I'm sorry to say, you can't come along. They don't allow dogs there, you know."
Section 4 goes far to settle the legislative intention of this phase of Act No. 671. Section 4 stipulates that “the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder shall be in full force and effect until the Congress of the Philippines shall otherwise provide.” The silence of the law regarding the repeal of the authority itself, in the face of the express provision for the repeal of the rules and regulations issued in pursuance of it, a clear manifestation of the belief held by the National Assembly that there was no necessity to provide for the former. It would be strange if having no idea about the time the Emergency Powers Act was to be effective the National Assemble failed to make a provision for this termination in the same way that it did for the termination of the effects and incidents of the delegation. There would be no point in repealing or annulling the rules and regulations promulgated under a law if the law itself was to remain in force, since, in that case, the President could not only make new rules and regulations but he could restore the ones already annulled by the legislature.
We need to actively search out information on these issues from academics, NGOs, research organisations and politicians so that we can do our job.
Surprising even for me was the book’s revelation that even among Arabic documents and artifacts, there is no mention of or example of any Qur’anic text until the year 691, a full 80 years after Muhammad supposedly started dictating it, and 60 years after it was completed and purportedly became the central text of Arab society. And even that 691 appearance — an inscription on the Dome of the Rock — may not have been a copy of Qur’anic text. From Spencer’s book:
Off to dinner. The place boasts 5 zillion eateries, most of which were closed on Tuesday. Probably to recover from feeding the hordes over the long weekend. Fortunately Clementines, highly recommended by all and sundry, was open for business, so thither we went. The wine was good, the food less so. In fact, bad enough that we refused to pay for it. Anna had what was touted to be a sole thermidor. She got a tired old fish with a small bowl of bechamel sauce on the side.
Sometimes being a hospital social worker sucks. I hope that I made a difficult process a little bit easier on her parents. I don't know. Her mother didn't interact with me much and I found out their other daughter was pregnant. Maybe my swollen belly caused her additional pain. Maybe she wasn't the type to 'share feelings' with strangers. It doesn't matter. I know I did the best that I could to transition her daughter as comfortably as possible. I know that mattered. I guess that is why I chose to do what I do instead of sprinkler of cupcakes. Because it's what I am supposed to be doing, no matter how hard it can be.
Can someone sue a film studio on false-advertising grounds after seeing a movie that appeared to be one thing in the trailer, but turned out to be another in the theater?
This film is about invisibility and well as silence. And yet it wears it all with such a light touch; it's so enjoyable, and it really does touch your heart. As Peter Bradshaw says, it has it all.
I trembled with the shape of the memory, but it is never everything anymore.
Honestly, I could give you all awards. It was really hard to choose just 5. But thank you so much for being my friend and visiting my humble little blog, and thinking what I write is worth reading. I don't know how I made it so long as a writer without the support of the amazing writing blogosphere (that's you).
”Those who think of the result of hastening or hindering the gospel think of it in relation to themselves and to the world. Few think of its relation to God. Few give thought to the suffering that sin has caused our Creator. All heaven suffered in Christ’s agony; but that suffering did not begin or end with His manifestation in humanity. The cross is a revelation to our dull senses of the pain that, from its very inception, sin has brought to the heart of God. Every departure from the right, every deed of cruelty, every failure of humanity to reach His ideal, brings grief to Him. When there came upon Israel the calamities that were the sure result of separation from God—subjugation by their enemies, cruelty, and death—it is said that ‘His soul was grieved for the misery of Israel.’ ‘In all their affliction He was afflicted: . . . and He bare them, and carried them all the days of old.’ Judges 10:16; Isaiah 63:9. Ed 263
And so I started to examine what core mis-Belief(s) I hold about mySelf. I mean, Mr. Carrey seems like a darn-talented guy (have you seen Man on the Moon? or Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind? The Truman Show? He’s brilliant!) so I think his opinion may have relevance in terms of how characters (identities) are formed. Knowing that each area of my life is a “character” I play, especially roles of “Doctor”, “Partner”, “Yoga Teacher”, and “Artist”, I started delving into the motivating mis-belief that gives life to each of these roles. It’s not as scary as I thought it might be. I thought my world might come falling apart…but it didn’t. As often happens with work like this, progress is made in quiet softenings, unfoldings of movement patterns, bursts of tears and cups of tea with journal entries.
The world didn't come to an end, so now I have to get busy and finish my two orders hahaha! As I have said before and doggone it I'm saying it again....there's never enough time to do all that I need to do! Okay I'm sorry, but there are days when I feel like one of those guys we use to watch on the Ed Sullivan Show who would spin plates. Please tell me I'm not the only one who remembers this. I can still hear the music....a fast,crazy,almost blood pressure rising kind of tempo. You just knew a plate was going to crash any second!
1/2 tsp xantham gum
A grown man had to cradle this arrangement in his lap in the back of a cargo van to deliver it to Cipriani 42nd Street last week. I collaborated on a table for the Lenox Hill Gala with my favorite bride and friend Ashley Whittaker and this was our jawdropper. Jawdropper is a good noun. Let's start using it, but sparingly.
Mr Orme said Daniel told police: "I can confirm I did not agree to be a candidate, I am not prepared to lie for anybody", as he was interested in pursuing a career in the Royal Air Force rather than politics.
Go home. Take a nap. When you are feeling civilized again, then I will deal with you.
I retaliated by pushing her off the bed... and fell back asleep.
Add in the costs of schooling for entry-level drivers that the company may pay for or reimburse plus additional costs of the training time after school, and you end up with a seriously significant amount of money that replacing drivers costs a carrier. While creating a level playing field using EOBRs or speed limiters due to HOS compliance or safety does not make a lot of sense, creating a level playing field to retain drivers does, at least to the larger carriers who support it. CSA takes care of both HOS compliance and safety issues adequately; there is no need for the rest of us to suffer for the wants of large carriers to save money by retaining drivers.
Yesterday when I came home, the GF was out on the deck grilling and crying. Now, I have yet to see her really cry like this. And my blood boiled. I had just sent the sister an invite to a surprise birthday party for my GF and of course I feel like her sister picking a fight had a little something to do with that. She is jealous of the time we spend together and will use her children as pawns in the relationship. Denying my GF access and visits with her niece and nephew and almost in the same sentence accuse her of not coming to see them enough.
DAISO is a 100 store in Japan. The store in Jakarta sells everything for IDR 22,000 per item. It is a handy store. I love DAISO!
I suspect I still confuse my teacher’s family anecdotes with Colette’s fiction and historical fact. But the great thing is that half a century of French history has always felt real. And, for that, I owe a debt to Mme Thysse.
And I made a board for all the places I wanted to travel to.
This may be heaven.
Simply make a card or other project with some sort of bug on your project.
"Oui, monsieur."
Breakfast is served from 8am until 9.30am and is included in the package. There is a choice of a continental buffet or a hot a la carte offering. We stepped out on to the balcony – and it was pouring.
Taken by Simon Greene
peel the eggplant in alternate vertical stripes from the stem to the base. Cut off the stalk. Submerge and soak the eggplant in salted water for 30 minutes, drain and squeeze dry. (This step is supposed to help remove the bitterness from the eggplant). Cut into small cubes about 1/2-inch wide.
Sure, people have asked me whether I have had Tiger tested and I have considered that in the past, especially in his preschool years when he was doing many exceptional things that were not normally observed in children of a similar age. However, as I read through all the literature written on the topic of 'gifted children' I could find from the library, there is no doubt that Tiger's behaviour is close to a perfect fit of the descriptions in the books. I don't think I need to spend a few thousand pounds just to have someone affirm to me what I already know about my own child. What I need are practical advice and suggestions on how to best support my child. No doubt that the hefty testing fees would include some kind of suggestion but they are usually geared towards solutions for school-going children, and honestly I don't think they can suggest anything that either (1) I am not already doing in our homeschool, or (2) someone hasn't already written extensively about in books. So back to more research.
Mrs. Megan only teaches each of them for 30 minutes.
Ok….so I don’t have any children. Not yet anyway. But I plan on having a couple someday and there are a few vital life lessons I want to teach them. For all of you who are parents reading this, you’ll probably shake your head and say…that girl should never reproduce. Well you could be right, but remember, you have the wisdom of hindsight.
So much for the nasty "x" word!
Ethical veganism isn't about "loving" animals. It is about fairness and justice for all animals...including the nonhuman and the human animals. It is an issue of morality...of what is right, of what is fair, of what is just. It is an issue of living as fairly and justly as we can.
they could tell her all the things I’d like her to know—and more.
Some jams for the blossoming spring, for the inevitable BBQs and late-night drives.
During breakfast, I started noticing the smell of something burning. It was the leaves. They burn the fallen leaves in Foshan (in China?). I have no idea why. The smoke was pretty bad. I had to teach one class of kindergarteners in a different classroom on the other side of the school so that we could breath more easily.
LIGHT BULB!*
As parents we have the responsibility to give children choices, real choices and embrace the decisions they make. Allow the natural consequence to happen, and be there when the child needs help processing what happened. When my son got suspended due to being next to the person committing the ‘crime” I went with him in to discuss it with the principal. We heard that everyone was being suspended as it was considered a potentially dangerous act and he needed to know that he was part of it by allowing it to happen and not stopping it. The suspension meant he was off the team until the end of the season. Although angry with the administration he took his punishment and learned. I did too.
All the moments I cried … I screamed hopeless … I whopped at night …
“Judge Ellen Rosenblum brings years of Oregon experience as a prosecutor and a judge, and she supports this key law that Oregonians overwhelmingly support. The choice is clear for supporters of our medical marijuana program or voter-approved initiatives in general.”
For my eyes:
The love she’d waited for was someone else not me
The majority of today's class was taken up by a great talk from state police Sgt. J. Jones, a member of the Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement, which under no circumstances should be confused with the PLCB. Sgt. Jones talked for almost 90 minutes about all of the considerations of running a licensed establishment, including the rules and regs for serving, open hours, gambling, and ID checks. He finished the talk with a segment on fake IDs and how to spot them. He also passed around several confiscated IDs from different states. It's amazing how poorly some people try to create a fake ID.
Q009) On the other hand, what DON’T you like? Tell us how you’d resolve it too!
If I have proven anything at all to myself it's that a person can lose weight at any age..at any size...but..they first must once and for all change their ways. No it's not the hard part! The hard part is not giving up. The hard part is really facing that deep emotional depression that comes with being powerless over food, the hard part becomes so easy(for the most part) when you start to lose by eating right!!!
"We no longer dare to believe in beauty and we make of it a mere appearance in order the more easily to dispose of it. Our situation today shows that beauty demands for itself at least as much courage and decision as do truth and goodness, and she will not allow herself to be separated and banned from her two sisters without taking them along with herself in an act of mysterious vengeance.
The outcome was this really cheesy, juicy and absolutely delicious kebab. The recipe is more or less similar to the Reshmi kebab, but I would say this one is waay better and so so good, it puts other kebabs to shame, really, it does! I don't usually brag about the food i make unless its extremely good. and this definitely is high up there on the food pedestal. I cant wait to make it again (once my oven gets fixed). I must admit however, that the cardamom taste in this recipe is prominent and this, in spite of reducing it drastically from the original recipe. But I guess that's really one of the specialities of the dish. Do reduce it even more or omit it completely, if you cant stand it.
Have the North Koreans totally lost the plot?
I chose to use pale, olive green transferware plates under these beautiful lavender transferware plates just to show how versatile it all can be. I also thought just a little touch of this green would compliment the lavender. These lavender plates have such a pretty border. They are by Grindley , entitled Scenes After Constable using John Constable's paintings as inspiration for the engravings. I did a post about this if you want to read more or see more in this pattern HERE. I've got a couple of these plates in my Etsy shop as well.
Meanwhile, Takoda makes a b-line for the fisherman and gets tangled in his line, not once but twice. They looked very pleased at me. Why do I put myself through this? Well, first of all, I’m sure you’re all saying “Why weren’t your dogs leashed?” I don’t know. My dogs are horrible on leashes. We live on 40 acres of freedom up here so they aren’t leashed at all. They respond (typically) to command and stay within the reach of my voice. Today, there were so many people down there fishing, it was so exciting to them to see these visitors in their “home” that Takoda was acting a bit off. He quickly straightened up though.
.... Walk the paths with me and see if you can hear them too ...
In all, God gave 613 laws through Moses. But none of us can perfectly follow even the Ten Commandments. In fact, one reason He gave us these rules is to show us our need for a Savior (Ps. 19:7; Gal. 3:24). In Hebrews 9:11-16, the Bible tells us that Jesus did more than the blood of bull and goats could do, it tells us that He gave himself once and paid the final price for our sin! Jesus sacrifice is infinitely more effective than animal sacrifices. Jesus became our Sin-Bearer that we could live in the freedom from our sin and its fate.
All 7 members (Uhm Tae Woong, Lee Soo Geun, Kim Jong Min, Kim Seung Woo, Cha Tae Hyun, Joo Won, Sung Si Kyung) were present for the filming and production director Choi Jae Hyung was present as well. The members will go on a trip to Jeju island.
Maybe more we will see...
After Ju-Ju Brush got himself a nice old cup of java he joined me and Party Time at our table and before he even took a tentative little sip to check for hotness he launches into this halting and sad monologue about his recent troubles...and I haven't even seen the cunt in fuckin years.
The first think I did was cut a paper grocery bag and fit it inside the pillow, just in case there was any bleed-through. (In this case there wasn't any, but I'm a safety girl!)
The league is full of hypocrites, talking out one side of its face about player safety all the while pushing for an 18 game season and increasing the number of Thursday night games which give players less time for their bodies to recover. Much of its recent action seems to be an effort to stave off the surging tidal wave of lawsuits alleging that the league didn’t do all that it could to protect the players.
“An intelligent chicken? No, we seem to be dealing with CRAZY PEOPLE, is what we seem to be dealing with here!” declared Arik, his eyes bulging and beard bristling.
It’s been raining for weeks. Pouring. Tipping it down. Barely a let-up in the all-consuming grey that threatens to simply wash us away. The rhododendrons are late.
Ironically, we met in the exact same visiting room he’d gone to see his dad in as a little boy. Dad did time for burglary, the same thing Jamie was in trouble for as a teenager.
Apples: Get a mix of apples, that way you are likely to have some of the best characteristics of each variety. I like granny smith, pink lady, and honeycrisp. Try to cut them all into slices of uniform thickness so they cook at the same rate. Sprinkle the lemon juice on the sliced apples right away, if its going to take you a while to slice them, sprinkle some on the cut slices as you go.
Preheat oven to 350°F.
Jennifer Hines Hall ... Towns Clerk
Devine Street Pop-Up Shop
Into your eyes.
6. Not only does the language of the bill not provide enough protection before the fact, but it also does too little to protect individual privacy after information is first shared with the government. As Sharon Bradford Franklin explains, “CISPA lacks any meaningful limitations on the ways in which the federal government may use personal information.”
appearance the whole piece has. Size: 2.5" X 3.5"
I paid a visit to the synagogue and I left there feeling blame
So, I'm in the Boston metro area for a few days. Anyone live around here that have an suggestions to do after work hours?
Again, thank you for having me here!
Every tear is done,
My wife is the most amazing woman in the world. No matter what she does, no matter where she goes, no matter what she thinks she will always be the most amazing woman in the world for me. That’s just how true love feels about another person. And that’s how it is with me. Today I shortly just want to encourage you men to be faithful and respectful and loving to your wife. I know that maybe in some circumstances it isn’t easy to please them but what you need to do is make the right choice. What ever circumstance you are in try to make the right choice. If your wife is asking you to do something and it really isn’t a big deal, just do it. It’ll make her happy and it’ll mean a lot more to her than it probably means to you and its worth it. This particular post probably fits happy marriages rather than all together, but it’ll help just anyone.
As a result of these multiple cycles the paths of gamma-ray sources trace out complex patterns from the spacecraft’s perspective, like this mesmerising plot of the path of the Vela Pulsar.
When it comes to MY birthday,I prefer NO surprises and a simple intimate gathering. It probably comes down to my desire to be prepared. How can I be prepared for something I don't know about. I need a heads-up.
“Su? Mianhae…. Jaejoong hyung asked me to accompany him tonight.”
What was left? The love of a mother and her two children, finally free from all that had bound them. Free to be us. Free to live. Free to breathe. Free to express. Free to hug. Free, free, free, free, free!
The style of the event is definitely going to have a vintage twist. I have loved birdcage veils forever and a day. I plan on wearing one for a small ceremony I will have with my family before we take off for the big party!
Tina said nothing. She stared ahead at the wall behind the man's head. She still had no idea what his game was, or even who he was. She sipped and looked into his eyes, taking in the portion of his self, everything she could discern from within the black soulless orbs.
and it's turning me into someone I don't know.
Alright friends, I'm off to enjoy this sunshine! Even if it is a crazy 30 degrees cooler than yesterday! xo
Wow, those are some calves you have going on. While starring at your legs that could probably run for 30 miles in stride without a glitch in your hitch, I’m almost falling off my treadmill because my sense of balance is so off. Oh wait, hold on……………whew, that was a close call. Running at a speed of 3.5 is dangerous compared to your pacing of 7.
The way things stay so solidly
Hill Crest Cemetery has long been known as Little Arlington to the locals. All but two of the twelve Generals from Holly Springs, who marched away to war in 1861, are laid to rest here.
The Daleks will make an appearance as it is clear that some of the action takes place at the Time War
4. Next week is finals. I’m not overly concerned since they are take home tests—open book and everything (I love my history teacher). Next Tuesday will be my last “official” day of school. Monday the 7th I’ll have to go back to ceramics to pick up my finished projects, but that doesn’t really count as a class IMO. I’m excited that it’s almost over, but also sad since I won’t be going back next semester (and maybe not the semester after that).
When you treat people like shit, they will act shitty. The young women who were chosen to work with me on this project are bright and capable and I have to remind them of this every goddamn day because they don't seem to ever get any other positive messages from the management of the company. In addition to the real work that I have to do, I have to take time out of every day to perform like a flippin' cheerleader in order to get them all motivated and acting like they give even the slightest crap about themselves and the work they are doing.
I am one of those these days rare “European”- feeling guys on this continent. Well, hopefully we are not too few after all…because, hey, despite all troubles, this continent is a great one and it is going to stay around for quite some while – so why not stay friends after all?
But then I was hogging our print copy of Gatsby, a book we both love, and he turned back to the Kindle. Guess what, he now loves Kindles!!! He's going to get one himself!
The winners will be announced on 9/21/12 on the International Day of Peace and Global Truce through this website and a winner’s certificate will be issued.
Tea, I do not have to wait to go, "Tease" You are".
She can't have babies
Funeral services will be held Saturday in Isabel, SD
And I chatted to someone about picture book text, which was curious.
add a pinch of salt.
We are, as they say, pleased as punch to upload a handful of some imagery and designs from our new Themes that will soon be available via our greatly-updated App.
Oh well, too late at this point. We shall see if anyone shows up at my house at 7:00 tonight.
In a sauce pan, pour 1 cup of Teriyaki sauce with one cup of water. Turn the heat to medium-low. When the meatballs come out of the oven, put them in the sauce and let them simmer and absorb the sauce for 10-15 minutes more. Move them around every few minutes because they may not all fit in the sauce. Sauce will reduce.
Another thing I disagreed with was his recommendation that I apologize at the end of a time out. PH also really reacted negatively to that suggestion. “I’m not APOLOGIZING to my child for parenting him,” he says, and I agree. It all comes down to Pantley’s point that we are being adults when parenting our kids, and we have nothing to apologize for.
I feel carved out in a dark searing place
When the police reopen the investigation, it casts suspicion on Allie and her best friend, Blake, especially as their budding romance raises eyebrows around town. Allie knows she must tell the truth. Can she reach deep enough to remember that night so she can finally break free? Debut writer Jennifer Shaw Wolf takes readers on an emotional ride through the murky waters of love,
After one of my classes I had two participants, who had both worked extremely hard in the class, come and see me. I knew their faces well but didn't realise that it had been so long since I had seen them both - time flies as they say!
Marliss Amiea ... Cindy St. Clare
It was Thanksgiving this past weekend up here in Canada. My American neighbours to the south have theirs towards the end of November, so there will be a flurry of Thanksgiving posts from them in a bit more than a month. The MoS and I had a turkey dinner, with all the fixings, all by ourselves. It was very scrumptious, if I do say so myself!
-Wipe it all out
But nowadays young people think they’re entitled to 10 of everything. Televisions, hats, slacks, fingers – you name it. They stagger through the outlet malls like an army of credit card clutching zombies – arms outstretched, mouths agape, blindly pulling items off the shelves with no idea of what they actually want; just an all encompassing sense of need.
Just today she blew on her food to cool it off at dinnertime and I just about died from the cuteness.
yesh gud tallperson has gud day
Creme giggled and jumped up and down. She loved going to the city. It took FOREVER to walk each way (her mom claimed it was merely an hour but it was soooo long) but there were so many buildings and people there! Her mom even said that her dad – Light bless his soul – had been helping to build the city again.
5 (aprox.) Fresh Fat Basil Leaves (or chopped up loosely)
While I don't have kids of my own, I do take care of 3 kiddos full time, and like me, she is super busy running around everywhere! She loves that she can get beautiful flowers from bulbs without having to spend a ton of time on gardening, and she shares tons of tips with you to make your home and garden beautiful. My mom didn't pass the gardening gene onto me, but she did pass on her appreciation of flowers! I am excited to use Digdropdone.com to help me with tips on how easy it can be to grow flowers! Bulbs aren't just for planting outside in flower beds either. You can use them in cute planters for the front porch, add some color to your bathrooms, or even throw a couple in a cute watering tin with a pair of gardening gloves for a great Mother's Day or housewarming gift! Go and visit www.digdropdone.com to learn more about how you can beautify your surroundings using bulbs. It gives you month by month tips for keeping your garden looking great. According to the bulb calendar, "The month of November is perfect to start on that first round of tidying up the garden. For some plants, a layer of leaves offers good protection. But gardeners beware: if you fail to move the debris quick enough come spring, the earliest flower bulbs may be hindered. To give your bulbs growing freedom, remove excess leaves and plant debris early on, making sure to keep your lawn particularly clean. Add some fertilizer to those bulbs that you left in the ground after they bloomed this past spring. You will be rewarded with more blooms next spring!" Go try it out and let me know what you think!
EEP!!! Exciting, yes???
-Laundry
My dearest brigade, as we look towards the future with sight unclouded, I hope that this last week will never let us stray.
On the way over, I started to feel a little funny. Like a pain in my pelvis. Once I got there and we walked around a little, I decided to use the restroom to see if I felt any better. By the time I made it back to my dad at the back of the store (we were only two aisles in!) I was having a sharp pain in my neck and chest and feeling really dizzy. So I told Dad I really needed to sit down for a second. He helped me over to a lovely chaise lounge that I am sure someone will love and then WHAM!
Faler’s wall is made of soap — or more precisely, two by fours fashioned out of soap have been used to build a wall. Faler has cast about 30 building pieces, each 10 feet long, all white, in front of exposed brick directly before the entrance to Building 5.
One of the EMTs went to the ambulance to get it, while the other gave me a little more morphine while we waited. He promised to give me a lot more once we got to the ambulance. I could see from the hallway that my wife’s mother and father had arrived to watch the baby, while my wife would go with me to the hospital. Things were looking up…
Obviously, if you have a reclaimed or recycled piece of wood, you can skip this step. But since we were using brand-new wood and I wanted a "time-worn patina" to match our new (old) table, I went for white spray paint that I would then slightly distress with sandpaper. Prior to the first coat of primer and between each coat, I sanded lightly with a 220-grit sandpaper. I didn't have any pictures of the spraypainting process, but keep in mind you should spray side-to-side in fluid motion about 8-10 inches from the surface. And so what if we spray paint using our clothesline. As if this post couldn't get country enough (Mason jar chandelier? We're not kidding anyone). We used an extra bungee cord to suspend the wood for easy painting.
I always love when this part of the week comes. Especially when we have a full weekend planned. Well, half of a weekend, anyway. Tomorrow is the annual Brew At The Zoo.
- oh sweetest of all sweet lusts! -
“Oh dear,” he said. “She really doesn’t get it, does she?”
Today I started a new journal. Before I wrote in it, I got to thinking about what might be written on the pages a few months from now. Will I be writing about more failed treatment cycles? Will I lose those 10 lbs that I want to? Will David and I have taken a fun trip for our 6 year wedding anniversary? Will I write the words "I can't believe I'm pregnant..."?
The first clerk is a youngish female with scarlet colored hair working in a fit of stops & starts. As I watch her, I see her flirt with a couple of good looking young men. A transaction which should have taken a couple of minutes stretches into 7 or 8 minutes. With the young men gone, she is back to looking harried.
“The lion of Judah tribe has triumphed.” – Also in memory of King Menelek II of Ethiopia and the year 1889.
The cards by my teamies are really diverse and gorgeous, you can see them all on the Sweet Stamping Pixies challenge blog! And don't forget to go to Cupcake too, where a new challenge is starting "Spring is in the Air"! Thank you very much for your visit, we hope you'll be able to join us! Have a lovely day!
come back home. :)
It means that every decision or action that you make, no matter how small, could potentially dramatically alter the course of your life. My life, as I am sure is the case with yours, is a testimony to “The Butterfly Effect.” When I was 12 years old, I met a friend named Brian in P.E. class. More than two decades later - Brian is still my best friend. At the age of 12, Brian had a thirst for learning and studying (the other 12-year-olds called him a nerd) - and he was a fitness fanatic. He still has these qualities - and because of our friendship they rubbed off on me. At the age of 18 - I needed a job and he secured me a job where he worked as a telemarketer. My third day on the job - I made a telemarketing call to someone in the seminar business. He thought I was a good telemarketer and offered me a job over the phone. Now I mentor 100′s in network marketing .. And as always you live well to be well…to your personal wellness…
Appearance (0-4): Served in a Samuel Adams glass. Pours up an slightly hazy brown color leaving a quarter in off white head. 4 points
Yipppee I am so excited for my post today as it is my first post as a member of the brand new Maggie Lovers Challenges....The challenge blog has been created by the awseome Bron of Shop Bron. For our very first challenge we have got a fairly simple one for you, Christmas (well seeming most of us have new maggies to play with this should not be hard) and then a colour challenge of either red and brown or pink and brown....
The Unwritten; Mike Carey and Peter Gross (Vertigo)
After all that 'work' (and I use that term loosely because it was also lots of fun), I deserved a night out on the 'town' right? Nod your head ladies! Cause this is the 'exciting' part:
- Projects must have been completed for UW course credit, for the Undergraduate Research Program (URP), or the Undergraduate Research Symposium.
He was persecuted and recanted but it still stands as an example of how we can become homogenous again safe from imported gang murders, muggings and Muslim bomb attacks.Civilisation is created by effort and genius and must be renewed daily but is being undermined by our rulers for a new world order. Through studying history we learn that civilisations decline and fall when they become decadent and the people indulgent, as in Egypt and Rome which is why history is being phased out of state education. People expect the state to solve their problems and spoiling them makes them dependent for not only material needs but their beliefs which are provided by the media and opinion formers so they become decadent and indulgent. Discrimination against us is presented as moral superiority - affirmative action. We who have emotionally bonded with our people and territory and belong here are being dispossessed by our rulers for unrealistic hopes of one world and those they brought here as cheap labour. It takes totalitarianism to make disparate groups unite and our lives are being increasingly regulated. A hospital visit needs a password and our confidential relations with our G.P.s have been destroyed now that our personal medical histories are put on a national database. We are becoming state property.The “Enlightened” ruling and cultural elites try to dismiss our views as prejudice but when examined their views are rationalisations of their prejudice in favour of other ethnic groups.
- Dunno how that could be, - I said, trying determinedly to take my mind off things the way terrorists under interrogation used to do in the ‘70s, by focusing on something else in the room – in my case trying to memorise the mobile numbers on the table.
I spent the past week in Disney with my parents embracing my inner child. We may have even ridden the Winnie the Pooh ride but there's no photographic evidence so you can't prove a thing.
12And the fourth angel sounded, and the third part of the sun was smitten, and the third part of the moon, and the third part of the stars; so as the third part of them was darkened, and the day shone not for a third part of it, and the night likewise.
and I'm drunk. yeah whut of it... umbrooklyn born and I'm a holiday-weekend-o-holic...
Our Sepia Saturday theme this week is scouts but the ever-kind Sepia Saturday administrator has allowed us to widen the theme to incorporate other youth groups. This allows me to feature this 1924 photograph of the 9th Company, Bradford Battalion of the Boys Brigade. The Boys Brigade (BB) was - and indeed still is - an interdenominational Christian youth organisation which has a history that goes back further than the more widely known Boy Scout movement.
Below is a guard along Whitehall (government buildings). One day, long ago, the knights were caught drinking and punished with performing a parade every single day for 100 years at 4pm. Though the 100 years have come and gone, they still do it anyway. Just in case.
Then once you’re fixed in hope and truth as on this rock you’re firm,
Do you think they look good enough to eat?!
How bad was it? These are the after pictures and they show AMAZING improvement. I asked the FYG to take before pictures and she flinched from head to toe (have you ever seen a full body wince?), and said, "Are you kidding? That would just be too embarrassing."
While wandering around one weekend, I randomly stumbled on a pretty great beauty supply store. Beauty Plus Salon is on the west side of Manhattan between 96th and 97th St. This place sells a good variety of the staples - OPI, Essie, base coats, top coats, polish removers - but what makes this one a winner is that they sell China Glaze. If you've been reading Gotham Polish or live in NYC, you probably have picked up on the fact that while we have many beauty supply stores like this, very few sell China Glaze. Each sighting is something to celebrate :)
So now you're gonna GET IT!
AB
The first weeks of January 2000 were hellish. Conflict boiled between Guide’s PR counselors and the company’s law firm. In mid-January, the attorneys recommended and received approval to take over the handling of all crisis media relations.
texture by Kim Klassen
Elsewhere, First Aid Kit take the listener on a trek across the north American plains (‘I Found A Way’ has a dusty desert vibe that’s akin, in parts, to the Rawhide theme music) before enlisting the help of an accordion, a fiddle, a mandolin, a bunch of trumpets and Conor Oberst for an authentic Americana jamboree (closing track ‘King Of The World’).
Middle left: gargantuan tree, outside Terminal 21
Nothing especially surprising in that, but he continued as follows:
Irishman 2: Or the 11:22 to Drogheda.
Char-ochres crayon burning dreams,
The grid paper is from one of the Prima ledger pads.
Breathtaking.
And he should be.
Ahhh...I'm so in love with her :)
Walnut whip, wagon wheel, white wine spritzer!
ps why didn't I know this was the finale of skins?... effy rocks and all, but cook made this show.
Underneath the same sky (underneath the same sky)
So later on, Derema and I did some typical weekend stuff- organize this, tinker with that, et cetera, and then we’re discussing dinner with our roommate.
Here's a sample of Karin fantastic work.
So, off we went and emailed Peg Kehret. The boys took their time and wrote wonderful notes to their favorite author, Peg Kehret.
So far, much of Grayden's care is just normal baby type stuff with the exception of all of the appointments. We spend our days much the same way that we did when Zander was a baby; he eats, sleeps, poops, does tummy time, cuddles, and then repeats all of the above. I just love every minute of it! I am soooooooooooooo not looking forward to going back to work in less than two weeks. I love spending time with my two boys and really wish that I could stay home with them.
BELIEVE IN THE LORD JESUS AND BE BAPTIZED!
This month we are asking you to make a card with the theme of flying...any style but include something that flies...Birds, Butterflies, Fairy, Angel, Plane, Hotair Balloon or even Pegasus!
All of that said, once the fundamentals are in place, once you've mastered the art of making an argument, once you know how to construct a paper, in short, once you have a grasp of the fundamentals, incorporating web 2.0 is a great pedagogical tool. For one, it makes the discipline available to people who aren't necessarily specialists. A blog, for example, is a great way to share what you're doing RIGHT NOW with your colleagues. Timothy Morton is a perfect example of a tenured professor whose blog, Ecology Without Nature, primarily appeals to romanticists, but it also attracts people who are interested in critical theory, ecology, pedagogy, and, well, Timothy Morton. It's a self-promotional tool, yes, but also a research tool. His blog is an ever-updating set of items that he has discussed at length in his traditionally published work. A constant work in progress. And while I don't necessarily agree with his research, I think his blog in an excellent model for those of us who are dipping their toes in the possibilities of web-based research.
I snap off a long and skinny branch and then turn back towards the canal.
PPC Quantum Energy S.A., a subsidiary of electricity giant Public Power Corporation, this week formally announced the launch of the construction of a 2,000-megawatt undersea electricity cable to link up the electricity grids of Israel, Cyprus and Greece. The company has notified the Regulatory Authority for Energy (RAE) and CERA, the corresponding authority in Cyprus, over the «EuroAsia Interconnector» project.
Others talk about the rewards enterprises can reap from the engaged. Social media guru Brian Solis points to statistics about engagement’s effects on sales: “An impressive 51 per­cent of Facebook fans and 67 percent of Twitter followers indicated that they are more likely to buy since connecting online.”[3]
Strong flavours in the curry will need a strong beer to match. ABV needs to be high but not too strong...say around 6%. The beer needs to be bitter and well hopped ideally with plenty of citrus aromas, it needs a small amount of residual sweetness. Looks very much like we are talking about an IPA.
One thing is kinda from and kinda from goals people say i should be doing for my future i should be doing for counseling i want to do but i can't - it sucks i can't make any commitment. I feel like i'm not doing much with my life. i want to be able to help people but i'm not. Can't help think -what if I were to die soon- how would I feel with my life? I know young to be thinking that but i've been thinking that. I want to live my life doing what's important but with people situations it's harder for me and I don't know why. Also in back of my mind wonder if i'll go to heaven. Does everyone have that or is it just me? also devotions have been hard and praying is hard and finding time for God.
Shortly afterwards the second dancer admitted publicly that it was she who made the call, and that the event had never happened. However, that did not stop press from continuing to report that the players had racially abused passers by.
We held our meeting anyway, and tried our hardest to get them to come, compelling them to attend as this would help them too - how can we progress in renovation works otherwise? But no, they refused on a point of procedure, so we went ahead, held our meeting and elected the syndic in their absence. We also made a summary of our concerns about Mr A's balcony and various constructions, and sent the meeting minutes to him.
Anyway, the reason I am babbling about all of this is because for the next four days, I will not be posting anything here at The Most Beautiful Fraud in the World. Now yes, the hotel will of course be equipped with wifi and all that jazz, so I will still be trolling about the internet as usual - my favourite film sites (The Self-Styled Siren, Ferdy on Films, Some Came Running, Sunset Gun etc), Marvel Digital Comics (like I said earlier, nerd), listenin' to some tunes on Spotify (Florence + The Machine is a particular favourite I recently got hooked on), watching The Yankees beat up on Boston, and so on. But still, no posts will come until Monday. Of course this could just be me lying to you and myself, and I may very well post something over the week-end. I am just that kind of guy. After all, it is not like I am really going off the so-called grid like the post title assumes. Why would I do that? I am not some crazy, conspiracy theory nutcase. I like the grid dammit. I like being front and center on the grid. I want to be surrounded by the fucking grid. I.....I digress.
And even more thrilling- the epic adventure that awaits us!
Annie is well and truly addicted to writing.. and to certain characters and plotlines…..might be argued that this is not a positive thing….Be Annies buddy during NaNo here or just stalk her shameless self promotions here on Twitter or here on Audio Boo and start your escape into her world here
To sell your soul is the easiest thing in the world. That’s what everybody does every hour of his life. If I asked you to keep your soul – would you understand why that’s much harder?
I lit the stove and was fishing, when unexpectedly I got a strike. The tug on the line practically pulled me into the ice hole. It released and the line became limp. I pulled up the hook and baited it.
overwhelming and that is why I like to have fun, quirky things around my office space to keep me motivated
9 months later and we sit staring at each other wondering what caused us to make the biggest mistake of our lives.
Hungary likes festivals. On any given weekend you can probably find a festival going on in some town in some corner of the country, whether it’s a music festival, a wine or pálinka festival, a stuffed food festival, or even an international jaw harp festival.
“Very thorough. Informed me of the newest listings. Made intelligent recommendations and opinions on listings without being pushy. The attention given to me made me feel as if I were the only client. I am extremely satisfied with the service.”
The demonstrators, who were marking the death last week of Spartak Moscow fan Yegor Sviridov, who was shot during a brawl with several men from the Caucasus, flashed the Nazi salute, chanted "Russia for Russians" and pelted riot police with flares, smoke bombs and metal fence posts.
- Alternating Lunges (15 on each leg)
Kreativ Bloggers:
But if you brush you’re hair when dry, at least my hair tends to become a little frizzy and floofy! ☺
It can be simple, grungy, and/or elegant, all depends on you and your embossing folders!!
Eliss is his friend. He wrestles for a moment, with himself, with his witch training.
Thurs- 5 miles easy
I can never get the hours back I spent watching half of this season. It had a few promising ideas in the pilot, but that quickly fell apart into a morass of awful.
So if you wonder why people think cops are assholes — look no further than stories like this compared and contrasted to the neverending constant barrage of abuse of power performed by those with badges.
Now, I’m writing my first novel. There are moments of Zen, but mostly it’s a pain. It’s boring sometimes. A lot of it isn’t good. Yet.
And the tired old commentaries of 'spirit of Vatican II' bloviators in assorted places which I won't bother linking too, on the grounds that they are a danger to the faith!
Some of this is unavoidable: Presidential administrations tend to suck up a political party’s best talent. The Obama White House, for instance, is full of Clinton veterans. But in the Obama White House, the Clinton veterans haven’t really acted like Clinton veterans.
I also know I've been around far longer than some of the estimates that have been given to people or to us, and there are good reasons for this. But it means that in a strange way, it dulls or deletes the expectation in many people that I will drop off the perch shortly or that some sudden event will do it in two minutes, possibly starting right this second.
Despite the bland weather and muted daylight, the architecture at Gardens by the Bay, both manmade and by Mother Nature, made us all very trigger happy. I would say that Gardens by the Bay is about 70% completed during this visit so when it gets finished in two months’ time, I am sure it will become the next hotspot for photography and lotsa nature lovin’ in the city!
Even if I agreed with them 100%, I wouldn’t be comfortable with anyone controlling as much of the media as News Corp and Disney do. I don’t want to say “I don’t like Rupert Murdoch” – I don’t know him. I’m certainly not happy to see him pied. But I am happy to see News Corp finally being taken to task for their actions, and not being treated like a sacred cow just because they control so much of the message.
Forget all the notions that fly and conspire
Do you want to be an actor or do you want to be an extra on tv, movies and film? Are you a casting director seeking people to be an extra or be an actor in your movie, film or television show?
Ele has overall not had a filthy mouth or tested too much with bad words. However, when she does, she seems to get them right on. When she was two years old I heard this from the living room:
Heck yes.
On Wednesday I sent my oldest off to scout camp, he has been river rafting, and on wave runners and just being a usual teenage boy.
I would like to thank the ten people who purchased my ebook “To Love a Beast” currently available on smashwords. You all are the greatest and it feels good to get the book out there and have people interested in seeing it. Money is nice, but readership is better! Thanks!
We updated our vanity with a new double sink and I have started painting the vanity gray, but I'm still deciding if I want to distress it or not. Part of me craves old, gray, distressed pieces like those made by Holly at "In the Fun Lane"... but part of me likes the clean look of just the gray...
Jumperskirt: Metamorphose
9. From A Tepid Whiff
One of the keys to wearing stripes (or any other timeless look that happens to be trendy) is to put a fresh spin on it. Ask yourself ‘what’s unexpected?’ and opt for a look that gives your old stripes a new lease on life.
Fennel-Spiced Pork Chops
When I got my tattoo, I was disappointed when the scabs came off. There were spaces with no ink, and parts were lighter than others. Everyone told me that the guy who did it doesn’t do touch-ups for free. His online reviews said the same thing. Sorry. I’m not paying someone to fix their mistakes.
You sleep every day, right? Sometimes more, sometimes less, and the quality can vary (me, it goes between crap and mega-crap).
My friends. It is a disturbing thing that when the powers that be (in this case, the Dept Of Immigration), have the authority to tear apart a family without proper justification and put it down to “policy”.
Did I mention the free beer on Friday? It was kick ass...especially walking through Whole Foods with Bender.
Apparently you have to go there.
"Telephones were jammed as every fan in Brooklyn called every other fan. Offices stopped work. Factories gave up as the workers went out into the streets to snake-dance.
The number arrested is far fewer than the 1,667 detained in the Bersih 2.0 rally in the city held on July 9 last year.
In his review for Shades of Milk and Honey, Aidan Moher questioned why magic didn’t seem to be used for more practical things than glamour, which covers all sorts of sensory illusions. Having read his review, I kept my eye out for just this thing, and I came to a different conclusion. Glamour—and, indeed, magic—appears to be largely a feminine art, as Kowal often describes it in terms similar to needlework; for instance, it’s composed of folds pulled from the ether and, in one scene, Jane picks out the stitches her sister has done wrong. In fact, it’s explicitly described as one of the feminine arts in the novel, as well as useless on the battlefield. This isn’t to say that it’s a solely female art; Mr. Ellsworth knows some rudimentary warming spells, the two cold-mongers (working-class glamourists) we encounter are male, and a one Mr. Vincent is the best glamourist we encounter in the novel. But while a young lady is expected to know glamour, it’s not a steady source of income, like most artistic endeavors at the time; Mr. Vincent lives an itinerant lifestyle unsuited to family life, as he himself says. I’m interested to know if this is a magical gender gap—women are just more likely to be proficient at magic than men—or a socialized one—men simply aren’t encouraged or are even discouraged to pick it up, and, perhaps, this is the source of magic not being used for more publicly practical purposes. I hope Kowal is inclined to return to her version of Regency England soon; I’d love to read more.
When I first came to this town the basement of the old bank was a hippie pizza joint, acoustic music, home made root beer , home made organic fresh whole wheat pizza made by the Pizza Queen, a one eyed obese woman with long stringy mouse coloured locks who rarely spoke to anyone other than to bark.There were so many characters going in and out of that happy place- Michael the Archangel being one of them, was sweet and nutty, lived in a tin lean-to behind the potter's studio, died of wear and tear there.
Yes, you take me for a blight
What a deal these bastards get. Rents of up to a grand per room per month. A security deposit scheme that provides additional cashflow. A housing benefit system that acts as a direct subsidy. And – unlike almost any business or profession – no rules, no red tape, no formal regulation. Oh, there was a scary moment a couple of years back when the Labour government proposed a national landlords register. But – hooray! – the coalition government tore up this commitment just a month after taking office. Its housing minister Grant Shapps stood up in the Commons and promised ‘good landlords across the country’ that ‘the Government has no plans to create any burdensome red tape and bureaucracy, so you are able to continue providing a service to your tenants.’ The National Landlords Association was delighted: its chairman David Salusbury responded that ‘We wholeheartedly welcome the reminder from Government that the vast majority of tenants are happy with the service they receive from landlords.’ I just bet you do.
During this tenure, Pakistan was & still is going through one of its most difficult phase in its history as the external forces have launched a carefully though-out plan to balkanize Pakistan by re-launching insurgencies in FATA, South Waziristan, Swat, Bajur Agency, Malakand through TTP, in Baluchistan through BLA & in Karachi through the provincial government partners.
Saturday: Potluck Pantry
Well I do hope you enjoy your weekend.
Marc turned out the lights, I remember how quiet it got. A contraction hit and Marc held my hand "Push, babe! You can do this" I started crying and saying "Nooooo, no, no, no..." Marc stayed calm and kept encouraging me through each contraction. At around 2:15 I cried to Marc "Im never going to have her! Whats wrong with me!" (Emotional signpost, anyone?) Marc went and explained to my Midwife what was happening and she told me to go and sit on my toilet and push. So I did, assisted by my sister Liz and Marc I waddled back and plopped down just in time for a contraction. I cried and cried, my midwife watched. This went on for awhile. My poor friend Lily called about the same time that I was pushing and yelling. She had just asked Marc how I was doing when she heard "UUUUGGGHHHHHHHAAAAARGGGHHHH" and said "I'll call back."
Non-Letter #4
How has your business grown since you won Cupid’s Cup in 2009 ?
While I laud his composure and poise and belief in his players, at some point he had to have known that the Penguins’ primary system was not working: the Flyers were beating the Penguins to the pucks in their zone, and when the Penguins did have the puck, the Flyers did an excellent job corralling the puck carriers and forcing turnovers; Flyers goalie Ilya Bryzgalov did not have to be great because the Flyers did a great job limiting the high percentage chances that the Penguins’ aggressive forecheck ordinarily produces.
"So how’s this story gonna end then?" I ask.
Here is my brainwave. I’m calling it BOOK BOUNCE. If you read a novel that you really, really like then I think you should try and bounce this book in the direction of THREE other people who you know. Now I don’t mean you to GIVE them the book and I don’t mean that you should just say, Oh read the latest Joe Bloggs, it’s great. I mean something in between these two things.
Last night I was sat on my bed staring at my sketchbooks and pencils that were scattered all around the room. I got angry. I picked them all up and threw them in a trash bag. I walked out to the huge green garbage bin outside and chucked it in. I went back inside. I sat on my bed and thought about what I had just done.
I let go of my shame of rejection and being betrayed.
Gouden Carolus Noel (Belgium), a strong dark ale spiced with herbs. Pair with salted pecans.
Although the entry fee is high, Mslexia are aiming at a wide range of authors, including new writers and women who have struggled to find an agent in the past. They'll also accept self-published novels.
inspirational videos, recipes, and pictures: www.Facebook.com/VeganLight
The next night, for no good reason, things were back to normal and we slept on opposite sides of the bed. We didn’t even kiss before we turned face away from each other.
in the crook of his arm forever.
I took Heizo out today! But people kept telling me Heizo's a dog =.=;; Heizo is a lamb!! Heizo is getting dirty and collecting some piling here and there...Always a cute companion for me ^^
We perish, deprived of Thy spirit and light
his son Belshazzar did as the Persians entered under the walls after diverting the Euphrates; you will see
* Papers - Basic Grey (not sure which ones as the front of the pad has vanished)
Fog : 10.4
Rarely does new country music catch my ear. Also, I hate Lauren Alaina. But hearing her sing this on American Idol made me search it out, so powerful was my reaction to the song. It’s a poignant track of the death of a young person matched with clever songwriting and a sweet bluegrass melody. These three siblings are ones to watch.
Many other countries change their clocks when adjusting to summer time, but the United States only began doing so towards the end of World War I in an attempt to conserve energy. The House of Representatives voted 252 to 40 to pass a law "to save daylight," with the official first daylight saving time taking place on March 15, 1918. This was initially met with much resistance, according Michael Downing, author of the book "Spring Forward: The Annual Madness of Daylight Saving Time."
Are people seriously discussing whether The Avengers will be a more memorable movie and/or will make more money than The Dark Knight Rises? Come on!! I love campy fun light superhero movies, but let’s get real here, how many people will actually remember what happens in The Avengers a year from now? The Iron Man movies were great fun, but I couldn’t tell you now what happened in them if my life depended on it. Chris Nolan’s movies are sometimes too humorless and cold for my taste (and enough dead wife/girlfriend already, Nolan!), but they’re always great fodder for in-depth discussions, and you remember them afterwards, even years later. On the box-office question, I’m still convinced TDKR has the edge, if only because of repeat viewings. The Avengers is not the kind of movie people go to see more than once (except for the most dedicated fanboys, I guess). Of course The Avengers is the one getting the most attention now, and people are “more excited about it compared to The Dark Knight Rises” etc etc, it’s opening really soon (in fact already opened in some countries), TDKR won’t be out till the end of July.
W-whh-what?! I can’t leave my house because I might become someone’s sex slave? What, do we never get in our car because we assume every time we drive we will get in to a massive collision? Do we never leave the house because there are axe murderers on every corner of suburbia?
*I'm getting no money for this recommendation, I just thing Trader Joe's Bacon Ends and Pieces might be the world's best bacon product. It's usually super thick meaty slices, and so cheap ($3 for a whole pound)! It's not good for when you want to fry in slices for breakfast, but it's perfect for cooking a bit at a time into recipes, and one package is enough bacon for baconing up 3 or 4 different dishes. It's great having it in the fridge for adding a little richness to a veggie pasta dish, or to make spaghetti carbonara, or a quiche, or anything bacon is good in (which is almost everything).
You can take each line in the model prayer and find at least two of the beatitudes that reinforce it. When you are done, all the beatitudes are mentioned at least once.
